<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88127-0032 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.1-27-88.f2.A1031</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 17 / Wednesday, January 27, 1988/ Proposed Rules<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Food and Drug Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">21 CFR Parts 201, 356, and 369</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. 81N-0033]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Oral Health Care Drug Products for Over-the-Counter Human Use; TentativeFinal Monograph</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Food and Drug Administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Notice of proposed rulemaking.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Food and Drug Administration (FDA) is issuing a noticeof proposed rulemaking in the form of a tentative final monograph thatwould establish conditions under which over-the-counter (OTC) oral healthcare anesthetic/analgesic, astringent, debriding agent/oral wound cleanser,and demulcent drug products (products for use in the mouth and throat)are generally recognized as safe and effective and not misbranded. FDAis issuing this notice of proposed rulemaking after considering the reportsand recommendations of the Advisory Review Panel on OTC Oral Cavity DrugProducts and the Advisory Review Panel on OTC Dentifrice and Dental CareDrug Products, public comments to the advance notices of proposed rulemakingon OTC oral health care drug products and OTC oral mucosal injury drugproducts that were based on the respective Panels' recommendations, andpublic comments on the agency's proposed regulation on OTC oral mucosalinjury drug product, which was issued in the form of a tentative finalmonograph. This proposal incorporates part of the tentative final monographon OTC oral mucosal injury drug products that was published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of July 26, 1983 (48 FR 33984) into the rulemakingfor OTC oral health care drug products and is part of the ongoing reviewof OTC drug products conducted by FDA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>Written comments, objections, or requests for oral hearingon the proposed regulation before the Commissioner of Food and Drugs byMay 26, 1988. Because of the length and complexity of this proposed regulation,the agency is allowing a period of 120 days for comments and objectionsinstead of the normal 60 days. New data by January 27, 1989. Comments onthe new data by March 27, 1989. Written comments on the agency's economicimpact determination by May 26, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Written comments, objections, new data, or requests fororal hearing to the Dockets Management Branch (HFA-305), Food and DrugAdministration, Rm. 4-62, 5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD 20857.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>William E. Gilbertson, Centerfor Drug Evaluation and Research (HFN-210), Food and Drug Administration,5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD 20857, 301-295-8000.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2> In the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of May 25, 1982 (47 FR 22760), FDA published,under andSection; 330.10(a)(6) (21 CFR 330.10(a)(6)), an advance notice ofproposed rulemaking to establish a monograph for OTC oral health care drugproducts, together with the recommendations of the Advisory Review Panelon OTC Oral Cavity Drug Products (Oral Cavity Panel), which was the advisoryreview panel responsible for evaluating data on the active ingredientsin this drug class. Interested persons were invited to submit commentsby August 23, 1982. Reply comments in response to comments filed in theinitial comment period could be submitted by September 22, 1982. In a noticepublished in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of July 30, 1982 (47 FR 32953), FDA extendedthe periods for comments and reply comments to allow more time for interestedpersons to adequately address several important issues raised by the Panel.The notice extended the comment period to November 22, 1982 and the replycomment period to December 22, 1982. In a notice published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of December 28, 1982 (47 FR 57739), FDA extendedthe reply comment period to January 21, 1983 to allow time for interestedpersons to adequately address several important issues raised during thecomment period.In response to the advance notice of proposed rulemaking, fifteen drugmanufacturers, three professional organizations, four health professionals,and two individual consumers submitted comments.Because there is considerable overlap between the rulemaking on OTC oralmucosal injury drug products and the rulemaking on OTC oral health caredrug products, the agency is incorporating that part of the oral mucosalinjury rulemaking that covers oral wound cleansers into this tentativefinal monograph. The intent of both rulemakings is to identify those ingredientsthat are generally recognized as safe and effective in temporarily relievingthe symptoms of minor oral wounds or other irritations of the mouth orgums. Carbamide peroxide, hydrogen peroxide, and sodium perborate monohydrate,the three ingredients included in the tentative final monograph for OTCoral mucosal injury drug products as oral wound cleansers, were also includedin the rulemaking for OTC oral health care drug products as debriding agents.A number of the comments submitted to the advance notice of proposed rulemakingfor OTC oral health care drug products pointed out the similarities betweenoral wound cleansers and debriding agents and requested that the labelingfor these ingredients be consistent between the two rulemakings. In orderto achieve this consistency, the agency has decided to combine debridingagents and oral wound cleansers into one therapeutic class and to includeit in this tentative final monograph. Oral wound healing agents, also addressedin the tentative final monograph for OTC oral mucosal injury drug products,were addressed in a final rule published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of July 18, 1986 (51 FR 26112).The agency's proposed regulation, in the form of a tentative final monograph,for OTC oral mucosal injury drug products was published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of July 26, 1983 (48 FR 33984). Interested personswere invited to file by September 26, 1983, written comments, objections,or requests for oral hearing before the Commissioner of Food and Drugsregarding the proposal. Interested persons were invited to file commentson the agency's economic impact determination by November 23, 1983. Newdata could have been submitted until July 26, 1984.The agency received no written comments, objections, or requests for oralhearing before the Commissioner of Food and Drugs in response to the tentativefinal monograph on OTC oral mucosal injury drug products.In accordance with andSection; 330.10(a)(10), the data and information consideredby the Panels and the agency are on public display in the Dockets ManagementBranch (HFA-305), Food and Drug Administration (address above). Copiesof the comments received are also on public display in the Dockets ManagementBranch. FDA is issuing the tentative final monograph for OTC oral health care drugproducts in several segments. This document is the first segment to bepublished, and it contains the agency's responses to general comments onOTC oral health care drug products and to comments on OTC oral health careanesthetic/analgesic, astringent, debriding agent/oral wound cleanser,and demulcent drug products. A subsequent segment of the tentative finalmonograph on OTC oral health care drug products will be published in afuture issue of the <T4>Federal Register</T4> and will contain the agency's responses to commentsregarding oral health care antimicrobial drug products, and comments onthe drug or cosmetic status of certain oral health care ingredients andclaims. In order to conform to terminology used in the OTC drug review regulations(21 CFR 330.10), the present document is designated as a ``tentative finalmonograph.'' Its legal status, however, is that of a proposed rule. Inthis tentative final monograph (proposed rule) to establish Part 356 (21CFR Part 356), FDA states for the first time its position on the establishmentof a monograph for OTC oral health care (anesthetic/analgesic, a stringent,debriding agent/oral wound cleanser, and demulcent) drug products. Finalagency action on this matter will occur with the publication at a futuredate of a final monograph for these drug products. This proposal constitutes FDA's tentative adoption of the Oral Cavity Panel'sconclusions and recommendations on these drug products, as modified onthe basis of the comments received and the agency's independent evaluationof the Panel's report, and the agency's reevaluation of the previouslypublished proposed rule on OTC oral mucosal injury drug products. Modificationshave been made for clarity and regulatory accuracy and to reflect new information.Such new information has been placed on file in the Dockets ManagementBranch (address above). These modifications are reflected in the followingsummary of the comments and FDA's responses to them. The OTC procedural regulations (21 CFR 330.10) now provide that any testingnecessary to resolve the safety or effectiveness issues that formerly resultedin a Category III classification, and submission to FDA of the resultsof that testing or any other data, must be done during the OTC drug rulemakingprocess before the establishment of a final monograph. Accordingly, FDAwill no longer use the terms ``Category I'' (generally recognized as safeand effective and not misbranded), ``Category II'' (not generally recognizedas safe and effective or misbranded), and ``Category III'' (available dataare insufficient to classify as safe and effective, and further testingis required) at the final monograph stage, but will use instead the terms``monograph conditions'' (old Category I) and ``nonmonograph conditions''(old Categories II and III). This document retains the concepts of CategoriesI, II, and III at the tentative final monograph stage. The agency advises that the conditions under which the drug products thatare subject to this monograph would be generally recognized as safe andeffective and not misbranded (monograph conditions) will be effective 12months after the date of publication of the final monograph in the <T4>Federal Register.</T4> On or after that date, no OTC drug product thatis subject to the monograph and that contains a nonmonograph condition,i.e., a condition that would cause the drug to be not generally recognizedas safe and effective or to be misbranded, may be initially introducedor initially delivered for introduction into interstate commerce unlessit is the subject of an approved application. Further, any OTC drug productsubject to this monograph that is repackaged or relabeled after the effectivedate of the monograph must be in compliance with the monograph regardlessof the date the product was initially introduced or initially deliveredfor introduction into interstate commerce. Manufacturers are encouragedto comply voluntarily with the monograph at the earliest possible date.In the advance notice of proposed rulemaking for OTC oral health care drugproducts (published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of May 25, 1982 (47 FR 22760)), the agency suggestedthat the conditions included in the monograph (Category I) be effective6 months after the date of publication of the final monograph in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. Experience has shown that relabeling of productscovered by the monograph is necessary in order for manufacturers to complywith the monograph. New labels containing the monograph labeling have tobe written, ordered, received, and incorporated into the manufacturingprocess. The agency has determined that it is impractical to expect newlabeling to be in effect 6 months after the date of publication of thefinal monograph. Experience has shown also that if the deadline for relabelingis too short, the agency is burdened with extension requests and relatedpaperwork. In addition, some products will have to be reformulated to comply withthe monograph. Reformulation often involves the need to do stability testingon the new product. An accelerated aging process may be used to test anew formulation; however, if the stability testing is not successful, andif further reformulation is required, there could be further delay in havinga new product available for manufacture. The agency wishes to establish a reasonable period of time for relabelingand reformulation in order to avoid an unnecessary disruption of the marketplacethat could not only result in economic loss, but also interfere with consumers'access to safe and effective drug products. Therefore, the agency is proposingthat the final monograph be effective 12 months after the date of its publicationin the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. The agency believes that within 12 months afterthe date of publication most manufacturers can order new labeling and reformulatetheir products and have them in compliance in the marketplace. If the agency determines that any labeling for a condition included inthe final monograph should be implemented sooner than the 12-month effectivedate, a shorter deadline may be established. Similarly, if a safety problemis identified for a particular nonmonograph condition, a shorter deadlinemay be set for removal of that condition, from OTC drug products. All ``OTC Volumes'' cited throughout this document refer to the submissionsmade by interested persons pursuant to the call-for-data notice publishedin the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of July 20, 1973 (38 FR 19444) or to additionalinformation that has come to the agency's attention since publication ofthe advance notice of proposed rulemaking. The volumes are on public displayin the Dockets Management Branch. <ITAG tagnum="84">I. The Agency's Tentative Conclusions on the Comments </ITAG>A. General Comments on Oral Health Care Drug Products 1. One comment contended that OTC drug monographs are interpretive, asopposed to substantive, regulations. The comment referred to statementson this issue submitted earlier to other OTC drug rulemaking proceedings.The agency addressed this issue in paragraphs 85 through 91 of the preambleto the procedures for classification of OTC drug products, published inthe <T4>Federal Register </T4>of May 11, 1972 (37 FR 9464), and in paragraph3 of the preamble to the tentative final monograph for antacid drug products,published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of November 12, 1973 (38 FR 31260). FDA reaffirmsthe conclusions stated there. Subsequent court decisions have confirmedthe agency's authority to issue substantive regulations by rulemaking.See, e.g., <T3>National Nutritional Foods Association </T3>v. <T3>Weinberger, </T3>512 F.2d 688, 696-98 (2d Cir. 1975) and <T3>National Association of Pharmaceutical Manufacturers </T3>v. <T3>FDA, </T3>487 F. Supp. 412 (S.D.N.Y. 1980), <T3>aff'd, </T3>637 F.2d 887 (2d Cir. 1981). 2. Noting its continued opposition to the exclusivity policy, one commentstated that FDA should not prohibit the use of alternative OTC labelingterminology to describe indications, if that terminology is truthful, notmisleading, and intelligible to the consumer. The comment's views on thissubject were presented in oral and written testimony submitted to FDA inconnection with the September 29, 1982 FDA hearing on the exclusivity policy.In the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of May 1, 1986 (51 FR 16258), the agency publisheda final rule changing its labeling policy for stating the indications foruse of OTC drug products. Under the final rule, the label and labelingof OTC drug products are required to contain in a prominent and conspicuouslocation, either (1) the specific wording on indications for use establishedunder an OTC drug monograph, which may appear within a boxed area designated``APPROVED USES''; (2) other wording describing such indications for usethat meets the statutory prohibitions against false or misleading labeling,which shall neither appear within a boxed area nor be designated ``APPROVEDUSES''; or (3) the approved monograph language on indications, which mayappear within a boxed area designated ``APPROVED USES,'' plus alternativelanguage describing indications for use that is not false or misleading,which shall appear elsewhere in the labeling. All required OTC drug labelingother than indications for use (e.g., statement of identity, warnings,and directions) must appear in the specific wording established under anOTC drug monograph where exact language has been established and identifiedby quotation marks in an applicable monograph or other regulation, e.g.,21 CFR 201.63 or 330.1(g). In this tentative final monograph, supplemental language relating to indicationshas been proposed and captioned as <T3>Other Allowable Statements. </T3>Under FDA's revised labeling policy(51 FR 16258), such statements are included at the tentative final stageas examples of other truthful and nonmisleading language that would beallowed elsewhere in the labeling. In accordance with the revised labelingpolicy, such statements would not be included in a final monograph. However,the agency has decided that, because these additional terms have been reviewedby FDA, they should be incorporated, wherever possible, in final OTC drugmonographs under the heading ``Indications'' as part of the indicationsdeveloped under the monograph. 3. One comment suggested that the phrase ``Try to avoid swallowing thisproduct'' be deleted as a warning for oral health care gargles, mouthwashes,and rinses because the ``Warnings'' section on the label should be reservedfor instances that pose a serious threat to the well-being of the consumer.The comment contended that the Panel's recommended warning is unduly alarmingto consumers who may conclude that swallowing even a minute quantity ofthe product will result in substantial harm. The comment suggested thatreference to the fact that the product is not intended to be swallowedbe included in the ``Directions'' section of the label rather than in the``Warnings'' section. The comment then claimed that the phrase ``Expelremainder'' more clearly signifies the proper and intended use of theseproducts without unnecessarily alarming consumers. The comment gave thefollowing example: ``Rinse thoroughly and expel remainder.'' The agency agrees with the comment that information regarding swallowingor not swallowing an oral health care liquid dosage form is more appropriatelyincluded in the directions section than in the warnings section of thelabel. Including this information in the directions section is consistentwith the style and format of other recently published OTC tentative finalmonographs.   The agency is not including the Panel's recommended warning in andSection;andSection;356.50(c)(3), 356.52(c)(2), 356.54(c)(2), and 356.56(c)(2), ``Try to avoidswallowing this product,'' in this tentative final monograph. Instead,along with other modifications (see comments 10, 11, 27, and the Summaryof the Agency's Changes, Nos. 18 and 19, below), the agency is proposingthe phrase ``and then spit out'' as part of the directions in this tentativefinal monograph (e.g., ``Gargle, swish around in the mouth, or allow toremain in place for at least 1 minute, and then spit out''). Includingthe phrase ``and then spit out'' points out that such products are notintended to be swallowed and is consistent with the working for directionsalready proposed by the agency for liquid dosage forms in the tentativefinal monograph for OTC oral mucosal injury drug products (48 FR 33993).The agency did not receive any comments opposed to this proposal. The agencybelieves that the phrase ``spit out'' is better understood by the consumerand is preferable to the comment's suggested phrase ``expel remainder.''B. General Comments on Anesthetic/Analgesic Drug Products4. One comment stated that topical anesthetic/analgesic drug products areoften promoted to the public with claims or implications that they preventor treat diseases of the mouth or upper respiratory tract. Objecting tothe OTC use of these drug products for the relief of pain or other symptomsof oral disease, the comment stated that the need to use topical anesthetic/analgesicdrug products should be ascertained by a dentist or a physician. In addition,the comment said that OTC use of these drug products ``may delay patientsseeking professional care for the underlying disease.''A reply comment disagreed with the comment's position, stating that it``is a denial of the public's right to self-medicate for conditions thatcan be safely and effectively managed utilizing over-the-counter drugsappropriately labeled.''The agency agrees that these products should not be labeled to preventor treat diseases, but disagrees with the comment that a health professionalshould first be consulted. The agency agrees with the reply comment regardingOTC use of topical anesthetic/analgesic drug products for oral health care.The Panel recommended labeling indications that clearly state that theseproducts are to be used for the temporary relief of occasional minor irritation,pain, sore mouth, and sore throat. The Panel also provided warnings todiscontinue use and to consult a physician if irritation persists or increasesor if a rash appears on the skin and to consult a physician promptly forsymptoms such as a severe or persistent sore throat or a sore throat accompaniedby high fever, headache, nausea, and vomiting, which may indicate a seriouscondition. There are also warnings not to use a product indicated for sorethroat for more than 2 days and not to use a product indicated for soremouth for more than 7 days unless directed by a doctor.The agency believes that the indications and warnings proposed in thistentative final monograph provide adequate labeling for the safe and effectiveOTC use of these products. Therefore, topical anesthetic/analgesic ingredientsare included in this tentative final monograph.5. One comment noted that the Panel's recommended monograph did not providefor professional labeling for anesthetic/analgesic agents. The commentstated that the agency has long recognized the need for labeling OTC drugsdirected exclusively to health care professionals because physicians frequentlyprescribe nonprescription products for the treatment of various conditions.The comment added that under Category II labeling for anesthetics/analgesics(47 FR 22826), the Panel included a list of phrases as indications foruse in conditions that properly require diagnosis by a physician. Theseindications include relief of pain associated with such conditions as tonsilitis,pharyngitis, and throat infections and such terms as ``stomatitis'' and``aphthous ulcers.''The comment agreed with the Panel that these conditions require professionaldiagnosis, but pointed out that Category I anesthetic/analgesic productsare safe and effective for use in such instances. Therefore, the commentrequested that the above indications for OTC oral health care productscontaining anesthetic/analgesic ingredients be included under andSection;356.85 <T3>professional labeling, </T3>for dissemination to health care professionals(but not to the general public).The Panel placed OTC label claims that referred to pharyngitis, tonsilitis,and aphthous ulcers in Category II to guard against self-diagnosis andself-treatment of conditions that are not amenable to OTC treatment (47FR 22785). The agency agrees with the Panel that such claims are not appropriatefor OTC labeling. However, the agency believes that Category I OTC anesthetic/analgesicingredients are as effective in relieving the pain associated with conditionsthat must be diagnosed by a physician as they are in relieving the occasionalminor irritation, pain, sore throat, and sore mouth that can be self-diagnosed.Moreover, in its discussion on sore mouth, the Panel stated that anesthetic/analgesicingredients can be used as adjuncts to therapeutic regimens outlined byphysicians in conditions where professional care is necessary (47 FR 22776).At the present time, there are some OTC anesthetic/analgesic drug productson the market that are also promoted to health care professionals for someof the indications that were placed in Category II by the Panel (Refs.1 and 2). The agency has determined that OTC anesthetic/analgesic drugproducts can be used for the relief of pain associated with tonsilitis,pharyngitis, and throat infections which must first be diagnosed by a physician.Therefore, professional labeling is being included in the tentative finalmonograph to alert health care professionals to the additional indications.In a new section, andSection; 356.80, the agency is proposing that the professionallabeling of products containing anesthetic/analgesic ingredients, identifiedin andSection; 356.10, may contain the following indication: ``For the temporaryrelief of pain associated with'' (select one or more of the following conditions:``tonsilitis,'' ``pharyngitis,'' ``throat infections,'' or ``stomatitis'')However, these same indications remain in Category II for use on the labelingof these OTC drug products marketed directly to consumers because consumerscannot self-diagnose and self-treat these conditions.Regarding the condition of ``aphthous ulcers'' (canker sores) mentionedby the comment, the agency has determined that this condition is self-diagnosableand self-treatable. Accordingly, as explained in comment 6 below, the agencyis including in andSection; 356.55 for anesthetic/analgesic ingredients theOTC indication ``For temporary relief of pain associated with canker sores.''<ITAG tagnum="74">References</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) ``Physician's Desk Reference For Nonprescription Drugs,'' 7thEdition, Medical Economics Company, Oradell, NJ, p. 650, 1986.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) OTC Volume 130038.</ITAG>6. One comment objected to the Panel's Category II classification of theindication ``For temporary relief of pain associated with canker sores.''The comment stated that canker sores are oral mucosal lesions that arecommonly and accurately diagnosed by the consumer. The comment added thatcanker sores are usually self-limiting and seldom lead to complications,and that it is not in the best interest of the consumer to require thatprofessional advice be sought prior to treatment with local anestheticsthat have been proven safe and effective. The comment requested that theagency modify andSection; 356.50(b) to include the indication ``For temporaryrelief of pain associated with canker sores.''The agency agrees with the comment and believes that canker sores can berecognized by the consumer and that the pain associated with canker soresis amenable to treatment with OTC anesthetic/analgesic active ingredients.The agency notes that the Advisory Review Panel on OTC Miscellaneous InternalDrug Products concluded that canker sores are self-limiting, tend to reoccurin the same individual, are self-diagnosable, but are not amenable to self-treatmentbecause of their diverse and usually unknown etiology (47 FR 504 to 505).However, in the tentative final monograph for OTC oral mucosal injury drugproducts (48 FR 33984), the agency stated that oral wound cleansing agentsmay be labeled for temporary use in cleansing canker sores because thoseagents could provide a useful function by removing debris from the ulceratedtissue. The agency believes that OTC anesthetic/analgesic active ingredientsmay provide an additional useful function by alleviating the pain commonlyassociated with canker sores. Therefore, in this tentative final monograph,the agency is proposing to modify andSection; 356.55(b) to include the followingindication for oral health care anesthetic/analgesic active ingredients:``For temporary relief of pain associated with canker sores.''7. One comment pointed out that statements referring to the time of onsetof action of local anesthetics applied to the mucous membranes, in termsother than in definite units of time, were placed in Category II by thePanel (47 FR 22826). The comment stated that for all local anesthetics/analgesicsincluded in the Panel's recommended monograph, the onset of activity isvirtually instantaneous, occurring within seconds. The comment also statedthat this rapid onset of action is the basis for the rational use of anestheticsin local pain relief and that the inclusion of such terms as ``fast'' or``quick'' in reference to onset of action for these agents is truthfuland not misleading. The comment contended that such terms are properlyconsidered as product attributes and that the agency should not prohibitcommunication of these qualities to the consumer.Claims concerning characteristics of product performance or attributeswill be dealt with in OTC drug monographs only when they imply the existenceof a characteristic that would be therapeutically significant for the drugin question. For example, ``rapid onset'' is a property that is not necessarilysignificant for most OTC drugs, including topical oral anesthetic/analgesicagents, but is important to the effective use of a bronchodilator in counteractingan asthma attack. Because the claims ``fast'' or ``quick'' are not directlyrelated to the safe and effective use of topically applied oral anesthetic/analgesicagents, the agency considers these claims to be outside the scope of themonograph. The agency will continue to evaluate these claims, on a product-by-productbasis, under the provisions of section 502 of the Federal Food, Drug, andCosmetic Act (the Act) (21 U.S.C. 352) relating to labeling that is falseand misleading. Any term that is outside the scope of the monograph, eventhough it is truthful and not misleading, may not appear on any portionof the labeling that is required by the monograph and may not detract fromthe required information. However, such terms may be included on the labelingprovided that they are not intermixed with labeling established by themonograph, and the statement is not false or misleading.8. One comment disagreed with the Panel's recommended dosage of benzocaineas an anesthetic/analgesic for use in a throat lozenge. The Panel recommendeda dosage of 2 to 15 milligrams (mg) benzocaine in the form of a lozengeevery 2 hours, if necessary. The comment proposed that the upper limitof benzocaine for adult use be increased to a maximum of 40 mg every halfhour, as necessary, with a maximum adult dosage of 1.3 grams (g) of benzocaineper day.The comment based its recommendation on marketing experience, feedbackfrom customers, and taste tests. The comment stated that taste tests, conductedon company personnel, showed that a dose of 20 mg benzocaine is necessaryto produce an effective level of anesthesia in the throat when sugar-basedlozenges are used and that in sugar-free products, the anesthetic effectappears to be inhibited and a larger dose of benzocaine (up to 40 mg) isneeded. The comment added that at these doses, the duration of anesthesiain the throat is approximately 30 minutes. The comment also stated thatits stability studies show that in a warm, moist environment, similar tothat encountered in the throat, benzocaine is rapidly degraded; thus, adosage interval of every 30 minutes rather than every 2 hours is more appropriate.Citing the ``United States Dispensatory'' and the Panel's discussion oftoxicity data on benzocaine (47 FR 22808 to 22809), the comment emphasizedthat its recommended dosage does not produce harmful or toxic effects frombenzocaine or its degradation products (i.e., ethanol and <T3>p</T3>-aminobenzoic acid).Because the comment did not submit any clinical data to support an increasein the maximum dosage of benzocaine in a lozenge formulation, the undocumentedstatements made by the comment cannot be considered adequate proof of thesafety and effectiveness of a 20-mg or 40-mg dose of benzocaine as a lozengeto be used every 30 minutes. Therefore, the agency cannot accept the higherdosage recommended by the comment for this ingredient without additionaldata being provided to support such a change.9. One comment requested that the agency consider phenol and phenolatesodium, at a total concentration of 0.5 to 1.5 percent expressed as phenol,as a single active ingredient rather than as a combination in drug products.The comment pointed out that the Dental Panel, in its report on OTC drugproducts for the relief of oral discomfort, considered phenol and phenolatesodium to be a single active ingredient (47 FR 22712). The comment alsonoted that the Advisory Review Panel on Antimicrobial (II) Drug Products(Antimicrobial II Panel), in its report on OTC topical antifungal drugproducts, stated that it considered phenol and phenolate sodium to be asingle active ingredient when both are contained in a product formulationand that the total level of phenol and phenolate sodium is expressed aspercent phenol. (See the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of March 23, 1982; 47 FR 12480.)According to the comment, in many rulemaking proceedings the agency ``hasconsidered salts of active ingredients synonymous with the free acid orbase when such salts do not significantly change the safety or efficacyof that free acid or base.'' The comment further objected to these productsbeing subject to the combination sections of the monograph and pointedout that phenolate sodium invariably arises from phenol-containing formulationswhen pH adjustments are required to make such products pharmaceuticallyacceptable, and not for the purpose of combining two distinct active ingredients.The agency has reviewed the Dental Panel's report on OTC drug productsfor the relief of oral discomfort and finds that the Panel evaluated severaldrug products containing phenol and phenolate sodium (47 FR 22739). However,the Panel did not distinguish between phenolate sodium and phenol as separatesingle ingredients or classify such drug products as combinations. It consideredsuch drug products as single active ingredient products containing phenolas the active ingredient.The agency has also reviewed the Antimicrobial II Panel's report on topicalantifungal drug products and notes that the Panel discussed phenol andphenolate sodium in a single writeup and discussed safety and effectivenessbased on the concentration of phenol (47 FR 12517).The Oral Cavity Panel recognized that the active moiety in phenolate sodiumis phenol, and recommended for a liquid dosage form a concentration of0.5 to 1.5 percent for phenol as a single ingredient and a concentrationequivalent to 0.5 to 1.5 percent phenol for phenolate sodium as a singleingredient. For a solid dosage form, the Panel recommended 10 to 50 mgof phenol as a single ingredient and a concentration equivalent to 10 to50 mg phenol for phenolate sodium as a single ingredient (47 FR 22814 to22816).The agency concludes that, because safety and effectiveness as an anesthetic/analgesicis based on the concentration of phenol, products containing both phenolatesodium and phenol are not considered as drug products containing two separatesingle active ingredients and are not combination drug products subjectto the combination requirements in andSection; 356.20 of the monograph. Accordingly,phenol identified in andSection; 356.10(g) and phenolate sodium identifiedin andSection; 356.10(h) of the Panel's recommended monograph are replacedin proposed andSection; 356.10 of this tentative final monograph with thefollowing: ``(f) Phenol preparations (phenol and/or phenolate sodium).''10. One comment stated that the Oral Cavity Panel had unnecessarily restrictedthe dosing frequency for phenol and phenolate sodium liquid formulations(mouthwashes, gargles, liquids, and sprays) in andSection; 356.50(d) (7)and (8) of its recommended monograph. The comment stated that a numberof studies submitted to the agency indicate that 2 hours is the maximumduration of effective anesthesia/analgesia typically induced by these ingredients.Thus, the Panel's recommended maximum frequency of ``three to four timesdaily'' is too restrictive. In addition, the comment contended that thisdosing frequency is inconsistent with the dosing frequency for lozenges,which is every 2 hours. The comment requested that the dosing frequencyfor phenol and phenolate sodium liquid preparations be revised to every2 hours.The agency agrees with the comment that the data support a dosing frequencyof every 2 hours for phenol-containing liquid formulations rather thanthree to four times daily as recommended by the Panel. Several of the studiessubmitted to the agency indicate that the duration of relief afforded byaqueous solutions of 1.5 percent phenol ranges from 30 minutes or lessto approximately 2 hours (Refs. 1 through 4). Only one study (Ref. 3) mentioneda number of subjects (17 out of 44) who experienced relief defined as lastinglonger than 2 hours. In that study, 27 subjects reported relief lasting1 hour or less. Although these studies were submitted to the Panel, theywere not discussed in the Panel's evaluation of this ingredient.The agency believes that the use of 0.5 to 1.5 percent phenol-containingliquid formulations at a dosage frequency of every 2 hours is safe. Inits report on OTC drug products for the relief of oral discomfort (47 FR22712), the Dental Panel recommended that the daily dosage of phenol notexceed 600 mg daily for adults and 300 mg daily for children 6 to 12 yearsof age (47 FR 22759). When an aqueous solution of phenol is used accordingto label directions as a mouthwash or gargle, the amount of phenol absorbedor ingested is small and well below the maximum daily dosage recommendedby the Dental Panel. One study (Ref. 5) demonstrates that when 1 fluidounce of a 1.4-percent phenol solution (411 mg phenol) is used as a gargleor mouthwash with a rinse time of 2 minutes before spitting out, approximately50 mg phenol (12 percent) is retained or absorbed in the oral cavity. Therecommended rinse time for phenol-containing mouthwashes or gargles is15 seconds (Refs. 1 and 6) indicating that under conditions of normal use,less than 12 percent of the phenol in the dose is retained or absorbedin the oral cavity after a single application of the drug product. Evenif an adult applied 25 milliliters (mL) of a drug product containing 1.5percent phenol every 2 hours with a rinse time of 2 minutes before spittingout, less than 550 mg of phenol would be absorbed or retained in the oralcavity over a 24-hour period, and the recommended maximum daily adult dosageof 600 mg phenol would not be exceeded.Because there is an adequate margin of safety when label directions arefollowed and because the duration of anesthesia induced by phenol-containingdrug products is less than 2 hours, the agency concludes that the maximumdosing frequency of phenol-containing liquid dosage forms should be every2 hours, the same as the dosing frequency of phenol-containing lozenges(solid dosage forms). Therefore, in andSection; 356.55(d)(6) of this tentativefinal monograph, the agency is proposing revised directions for productscontaining phenol preparations (phenol and/or phenolate sodium) that reflecta dosing frequency of every 2 hours.<ITAG tagnum="74">References</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Bronsky, D.A., ``to Evaluate the Efficacy of Both ChlorasepticSolution and Chloraseptic Lozenges When Used to Relieve the Gingival andBuccal Mucosal Discomfort Associated with Orthodontic Braces,'' draft ofunpublished study, C00014, Docket No. 80N-0033, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Blum, B., ``Clinical Evaluation of an Anesthetic Mouthwash,''<T3>The New York State Dental Journal, </T3>26:419-421, 1960.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Young, J.R., ``Use of Phenol Anesthetic Spray for Pain Relief,''<T3>E.E.N.T. Digest, </T3>30:51-60, 1968.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Braunlin, E.A., ``Evaluation of an Antiseptic, Anesthetic Solution,''<T3>Journal of the National Medical Association, </T3>56:151-152, 1964.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) OTC Volume 130065</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) OTC Volume 13ATFM.</ITAG>11. One comment noted that although the Panel's recommended monograph providesfor a gel form of benzocaine as an anesthetic/analgesic, a gel formulationfor phenol was apparently inadvertently omitted. The comment requestedthat phenol as a 0.5- to 1.5-percent gel (i.e., the Category I concentrationof phenol as an anesthetic/analgesic ingredient in a gel formulation) beincluded in the tentative final monograph.The agency agrees that an aqueous gel formulation is an acceptable dosageform of phenol for use as an anesthetic/analgesic. Moreover, any CategoryI oral health care active ingredient may be formulated in any rationaldosage form that is consistent with the directions for use of the product,provided that the ingredient is present at the specified dosage and theproduct is manufactured according to the regulations for the Current GoodManufacturing Practice for Finished Pharmaceuticals (21 CFR Part 211).Therefore, the agency finds it unnecessary to list specific dosage formsfor oral health care drug products unless the dosage form is specificallyrelevant to the use, safety, or effectiveness of the ingredient.Accordingly, to allow for the different solid dosage forms (e.g., lozenges,compressed tablets) and nonsolid dosage forms (e.g., mouthwashes, gels)that may be used when formulating oral health care drug products, the agencyis using the terms ``solid dosage forms'' and ``dosage forms other thansolid'' in this tentative final monograph and is not adopting words suchas ``rinse,'' ``mouthwash,'' ``lozenge,'' ``gel,'' etc., that appearedin the advance notice of proposed rulemaking, except where the specificdosage form is relevant to the use, safety, or effectiveness of the ingredient.The directions in andSection;andSection; 356.55(d), 356.65(d), 356.70(d), and356.75(d) of this tentative final monograph, where appropriate, use theterms ``solid dosage forms'' and ``dosage forms other than solid.''12. Although agreeing with the Panel's recommended concentration of 0.04to 2 percent menthol as an anesthetic/analgesic in liquid oral health careproducts (47 FR 22928), one comment contended that the recommended dosagefor menthol per lozenge (2 to 20 mg) does not include the lowest dosagelevel that was submitted to the Panel. The comment claimed that a submissionto the Panel contained a study showing that 1 mg menthol per 2-g lozengeexerted a statistically significant pharmacologic effect in the oral cavity(Ref. 1). The comment contended that as a result of reviewing the studyin the submission to the Panel (Ref. 1) and subsequent literature providedon the method used in the study (Ref. 2), the Panel accepted the citricacid aerosol test for the assessment of drug activity. The comment recommendedrevision of the minimum effective dose for menthol in lozenges to includedoses down to and including 1 mg per lozenge.The agency reviewed the submission referred to by the comment (Ref. 1),but did not find a study using a concentration of 1 mg menthol per 2-glozenge. The only study in the submission that specified the concentrationof menthol was one in which menthol was used in combination at a concentrationof 9 mg per 3-g lozenges (Ref. 3). The agency concludes that the data inthis study cannot be used to support the effectiveness of menthol as anoral health care anesthetic/analgesic ingredient at doses down to and including1 mg per lozenge, as recommended by the comment, because the study investigateda higher dose of menthol in a combination product. Therefore, any pharmacologiceffect observed in the oral cavity can neither be attributed to mentholalone nor to menthol at the lower dosage level, as the comment claims.Regarding the comment's statement that the Panel accepted the citric acidaerosol test for the assessment of drug activity, the agency's position,as stated in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of October 19, 1983 (48 FR 48582), is that induced-coughstudies are supportive, but are not a substitute for adequate and well-controlledstudies in the target population. Additionally, cough reduction alone isnot sufficient proof of the effectiveness of an ingredient labeled as ananesthetic/analgesic for oral health care use. Studies conducted on drugsfor these uses must demonstrate a decrease in sore mouth or sore throatpain.Therefore, the agency is proposing a Category III classification for lessthan 2 mg menthol as an anesthetic/analgesic active ingredient for usein a solid dosage form.<ITAG tagnum="74">References</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) OTC Volume 130095.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Packman, E.W., and S.J. London, ``The Utility of ArtificiallyInduced Cough as a Clinical Model for Evaluating Antitussive Drug Combinations.Part I: Liquid and Solid Formulations of Systemic Drug,'' <T3>Current Therapeutic Research, </T3>21:855-866, 1977.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Packman, E.W., ``Victors'' (Study CRD No. 71-7), draft of unpublishedstudy, OTC Volume 130095.</ITAG>13. One comment noted that the Panel recommended a 0.05 to 5 percent concentrationof benzyl alcohol as an anesthetic/analgesic ingredient as a liquid anda minimum of 100 mg as a lozenge. The comment stated that for a usual 2-glozenge, 100 mg corresponds to 5 percent, the maximum concentration allowedfor liquids. However, because a lozenge is in contact with the oral cavityfor a much longer period of time than a mouthwash or a spray, the benzylalcohol has a much greater opportunity to exert the desired effect. Notingthat as little as a 1-percent concentration is used for parenteral injectionto produce an anesthetic effect, the comment recommended that the minimumcontent of benzyl alcohol for use in a lozenge be reduced to 5 mg (equivalentto 0.05 percent in 10 mL of a solution).The Panel recommended a maximum concentration of 10 percent benzyl alcoholwhen formulated as a liquid, not 5 percent as stated by the comment (47FR 22928). Thus, the amount of benzyl alcohol in the 2-g lozenge containing100 mg of benzyl alcohol mentioned by the comment would not correspondto the maximum concentration recommended for a liquid.The Panel acknowledged that the effect of benzyl alcohol when incorporatedin a lozenge is sustained as long as the mucous membranes are bathed ina sufficient concentration of drug, but that the duration of action whenbenzyl alcohol is incorporated in rinses is brief, seldom more than 5 to10 minutes (47 FR 22810). It would be expected that lower concentrations,such as 1 percent benzyl alcohol, when injected parenterally or when usedas a rinse would produce an anesthetic effect because all of the drug isimmediately available. In lozenge form, however, the amount of drug availableis dependent upon other factors, such as the dissolution rate of the lozengeand the total concentration of drug in the lozenge. Thus, the anestheticeffect of the two formulations (lozenge and liquid) containing the sameconcentration of benzyl alcohol may not be the same because the amountof benzyl alcohol available at any one time in a lozenge would be lessthan that available in a liquid.The Panel believed that a minimum dose of 100 mg in a lozenge is appropriatein order to produce an anesthetic effect. No data were submitted by thecomment to support the effectiveness of a dose lower than 100 mg per lozengefor benzyl alcohol as a topical anesthetic/analgesic active ingredient.Therefore, the agency has no basis for proposing that 5 mg be the minimumallowable content for a lozenge. The agency invites the submission of datain support of the effectiveness of the comment's suggested lower minimumdose for benzyl alcohol in lozenge form.14. Urging approval of internal analgesics for relief of minor sore throatpain, two comments stated that internal analgesics have been properly usedfor many years to treat this minor condition. The comments provided severalreferences to support this claim. The comments pointed out, however, thatthe Advisory Review Panel on Over-the-Counter (OTC) Internal Analgesicand Antirheumatic Products (Internal Analgesic Panel) placed such claimsfor internal analgesics in Category II. The comments disagreed with therecommendation, noting that the review of drugs for relief of minor sorethroat pain was assigned to the Oral Cavity Panel. Therefore, the commentsconsidered it appropriate to include internal analgesics for this indicationin the monograph for OTC oral health care drug products.The agency notes that the Oral Cavity Panel was charged with evaluatingingredients and labeling used in OTC anesthetic/analgesic preparationsintended strictly for local, topical application to the mucous membranesof the oral cavity (mouth) and pharynx (throat). The Oral Cavity Paneleither classified ingredients and labeling for anesthetic/analgesic preparationsthat act systemically as Category II (47 FR 22765), or it deferred thoseingredients known or presumed to be absorbed and to act systemically toother panels for evaluation.The agency agrees with the Oral Cavity Panel's recommendation that systemicrelief of minor sore throat pain should be addressed in the rulemakingfor OTC internal analgesic, antipyretic, and antirheumatic drug productsand has transferred all comments and associated submissions regarding internalanalgesics for the relief of minor sore throat pain to that rulemaking(Docket No. 77N-0094) (Ref. 1). The agency's findings on this subject willbe addressed within the context of the rulemaking for OTC internal analgesic,antipyretic, and antirheumatic drug products in a future issue of the <T4>Federal Register.</T4> The agency discusses the use of topically appliedaspirin for the relief of minor sore throat pain in this tentative finalmonograph. (See comment 15 below.)<ITAG tagnum="74">Reference</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Memo No. 00006, Docket No. 77N-0094, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG>15. Two comments agreed with the Panel's majority report on the safetyand effectiveness of aspirin that ``aspirin is safe and effective as anOTC anesthetic/analgesic active ingredient for topical use on the mucousmembranes of the mouth and throat * * *.'' (47 FR 22796). One comment concurredwith the majority of the Panel that the speed of the response excludeda systemic analgesic effect resulting from the absorption of aspirin. Bothcomments stated that these conclusions were based on a careful review ofthe published literature, the submissions to the Panel, and the original,independent work of one of the Panel members.One comment maintained that several of the safety issues raised in thePanel's minority report on aspirin as a topical analgesic were not uniqueto aspirin in chewing gum form and were not supported by the quoted references.The comment then listed the following examples:(1) The effect of a conventional aspirin tablet applied directly to themucous membranes of the mouth (47 FR 22799) has little relevance to theevaluation of the safety of aspirin in chewing gum form.(2) One of the reports of mouth ulcers associated with aspirin in chewinggum form cited in the minority report (47 FR 22799) involved an obviousabuse situation in which the consumer had chewed 8 to 10 gum tablets aday for 6 to 10 weeks.(3) Two references to several cases of massive hemorrhage from the tonsillarbed following topical application of a ``gargle of aspirin-containing chewinggum'' (47 FR 22800) have been incorrectly quoted. The comment stated thatneither reference involves the topical application of a ``gargle of aspirincontaining chewing gum.'' It asserted that one of these references presentedthe results of laboratory experiments in dogs treated with a variety ofsubstances, including aspirin, placed in the gastrointestinal tract. Theother reference discusses the effect of an aspirin suspension intendedfor systemic absorption.(4) The comment quoted the following statements from the Panel's minorityreport (47 FR 22800): ``Hemorrhage was observed in 8 percent of 100 posttonsillectomypatients medicated with aspirin * * *. No bleeding occurred in 100 patientsmedicated with acetaminophen.'' The comment stated that this report involvedan aspirin suspension and therefore was not applicable to aspirin in chewinggum form.(5) A study cited in the Panel's minority report (47 FR 22800) describeda high incidence of post-tonsillectomy bleeding in children treated withan aspirin-containing chewing gum. The comment stated that this study involveda select subgroup of the population, and that it would be more sensibleto restrict the use of aspirin-containing gum by this small subgroup thanto deny the rest of the population the benefit of such a product. The commentmaintained that the warnings included in andSection; 356.50(c)(2)(iv) ofthe Panel's recommended monograph prohibit the use of chewable aspirin-containingdrug products immediately following oral surgery.The comment maintained that the safety concerns voiced by the minorityof the Panel were not adequately documented and that some concerns wouldbe more properly handled by labeling than by removal of the product. Thecomment requested that aspirin in a chewing gum dosage form remain in CategoryI for safety as a topical analgesic consistent with the conclusion of themajority of the Panel.The majority of the Panel concluded that aspirin incorporated in a chewinggum base is safe and effective as an OTC anesthetic/analgesic ingredientfor topical use on the mucous membranes of the mouth and throat. However,the minority of the Panel members concluded that there were insufficientdata available to permit final classification of the safety and effectivenessof aspirin as an OTC anesthetic/analgesic active ingredient for topicaluse on the mucous membranes of the mouth and throat. The minority of thePanel members had serious reservations about the safety of topically appliedaspirin used in the oral cavity and believed that aspirin has no knowntopical anesthetic or analgesic activity. They felt that any analgesiceffect from aspirin applied topically in the oral cavity is ultimatelydue to systemic absorption and not to topical application.In the tentative final monograph for OTC internal analgesic, antipyretic,and antirheumatic drug products, to be published in a future issue of the<T4>Federal Register,</T4> the agency will discuss the systemic effectivenessof aspirin in chewing gum form for the relief of many kinds of pain includingsore throat pain. However, with regard to the effectiveness of aspirinas a topical analgesic active ingredient for use on the mucous membranesof the mouth and throat, the agency disagrees with the comments and agreeswith the minority of the Oral Cavity Panel members that there are insufficientdata available to permit final classification.The conclusion of the majority of the Panel members that aspirin is aneffective topical analgesic ingredient was based upon a Panel member'soral presentation to the Panel describing his independent research, whichwas later published in the literature (Ref. 1), and upon a study by Scott(Ref. 2) indicating that aspirin applied topically to dentin in artificialcavities in a cat's incisor inhibits steady state discharge and responseto a brief heat stimulus. However, the agency believes that aspirin's mode(or modes) of action have not been well elucidated and another recent publicationby Adriani, Minokadeh, and Naraghi (Ref. 3), which was not available tothe Panel, contradicts the results of the Panel member's research mentionedabove (Ref. 1). This more recent study used an established method of algesimetryin which an electric current is applied to the tip of the tongue as a painfulstimulus and found that a saturated solution of aspirin has no more analgesiceffect on the tip of the tongue than the placebo (saline).In the advance notice of proposed rulemaking for OTC external analgesicdrug products (published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of December 4, 1979; 44 FR 69846 to 69847), theAdvisory Review Panel on OTC Topical Analgesic, Antirheumatic, Otic, Burn,and Sunburn Prevention and Treatment Drug Products (Topical Analgesic Panel)stated that aspirin possesses no topical anesthetic activity and does notblock the neuronal membranes as do topical anesthetics such as benzocaine.That Panel concluded that although percutaneous absorption of salicylateoccurs, any subsequent analgesic effect is systemic and not local. In theadvance notice of proposed rulemaking for OTC internal analgesic, antipyretic,and antirheumatic drug products (published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of July 8, 1977; 42 FR 35376 to 35377), the InternalAnalgesic Panel determined that although aspirin has historically beenused as a gargle for the treatment of minor sore throat pain, aspirin orany analgesic in a gum base has not been adequately tested for effectivenessin the treatment of sore throat pain. That Panel deferred aspirin in achewing gum base and the use of aspirin as a gargle for a local topicaleffect to the Oral Cavity Panel for evaluation (42 FR 35376 and 47 FR 22801).Although the topical use of aspirin in chewing gum dosage form for therelief of minor sore throat pain is discussed in this notice, the agencyhas determined that the role of internal analgesic drug products, includingthe systemic effects of aspirin in a chewing gum form, and their labelingfor the relief of minor sore throat pain will be addressed within the contextof the rulemaking for OTC internal analgesic drug products in a futureissue of the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. (See comment 14 above.)The agency believes that because there was a divided recommendation bythe Oral Cavity Panel, because two other Panels concluded that aspirinhas no known local analgesic effect, and because the referenced publications(Refs. 1 and 3) present conflicting data, a reasonable question existsregarding the ability of aspirin to exert a topical analgesic effect onthe oral mucosa. Furthermore, it should be noted that the agency is notaware of any OTC aspirin products in tablet or lozenge dosage form thatare marketed specifically for topical use. The OTC aspirin product in achewing gum dosage form that was submitted to the Internal Analgesic Panelas an internal analgesic and subsequently was submitted to the Oral CavityPanel is not specifically labeled for topical oral use. The product's currentindications include temporary relief of minor sore throat pain, headache,aches and pains of colds, and muscular aches and pains (Ref. 4). Therefore,the agency is classifying aspirin when labeled for topical use in CategoryIII for effectiveness as an analgesic for use in the oral cavity for therelief of pain associated with minor sore throat. The agency recommendsthat testing using protocols similar to those employed in the study byAdriani, Minokaden, and Naraghi (Ref. 3) are necessary to demonstrate thataspirin produces a statistically and clinically significant topical analgesiceffect in the oral cavity. Manufacturers may want to discuss their proposedprotocol(s) with the agency prior to performing studies. The agency invitesfurther comments and data on this use of aspirin.With regard to the safety of aspirin for topical use in the oral cavity,the agency accepts the conclusion of the majority of the Panel and agreeswith the comments that aspirin in a chewing gum base is safe for topicaluse on the mucous membranes of the mouth and throat when labeled with adequatewarnings against misuse. The agency also agrees with the one comment thattwo references (Refs. 5 and 6) cited in the Panel's minority report (47FR 22800) are misquoted. However, both articles do point out that aspirinis irritating to mucous membranes and emphasize the need for proper labeling.Also, contrary to the comment's contention, two publications (Refs. 7 and8) cited in the minority report (47 FR 22799) did involve aspirin in achewing gum base. In one case report, aspirin in a chewing gum and aspirintablets were both applied to the roof of the mouth and resulted in localulceration within a week. Upon removal of both forms of medication, theulceration healed (Ref. 7). In this report, the lesions could have beencaused by either form of aspirin or the unusual combination of both. Inthe other case report, a consumer chewed 8 to 10 gum tablets a day for6 to 10 weeks (Ref. 8). Although prolonging treatment with aspirin-containingchewing gum for 6 to 10 weeks is an abusive situation, the ulcers werereported to have been present for 6 to 10 weeks also. This indicates thatthe ulcers could have been caused by or aggravated by misuse of the aspirin-containingchewing gum. The ulcers healed promptly when the gum was discontinued.These two reports, as well as another mentioned by the comment (Ref. 9),indicate the topical irritant action of salicylates on the mucous membranesof the mouth and point out the necessity for adequate warnings againstmisuse.The agency acknowledges that aspirin increases bleeding time and inhibitsplatelet aggregation (42 FR 35384 and 47 FR 22797). In addition, aspirin-relatedhemorrhage after oral surgery is a well-documented occurrence (Refs. 10,11, and 12). The agency agrees with both the Panel and the one commentthat aspirin in any form should not be used after oral surgery or tonsillectomy(47 FR 22798 and 22801). In addition, the agency agrees with the Panelthat aspirin should not be used either systemically or topically when mucousmembranes are highly inflamed or abraded, when there are eroded, bleedinglesions, or when the consumer is on anticoagulant medication (47 FR 22798).In order to address the above-mentioned safety concerns, the majority ofthe Panel suggested the following warnings for aspirin-containing oralhealth care drug products in its recommended monograph:Section 356.60(c)(2)(ii) ``Do not use if you have a bleeding problem orif you are taking an anticoagulant drug.''Section 356.60(c)(2)(iii) ``Do not use without a physician's or dentist'sadvice if your mouth is highly irritated or ulcerated.''Section 356.60(c)(2)(iv) ``Do not use after surgery in the mouth or throat.''The agency believes that these warnings, with some minor modifications,are sufficient to protect the consumer against any adverse effects resultingfrom the use of aspirin in a chewing gum base in the oral cavity. The InternalAnalgesic Panel, in its report, recommended that all aspirin products formulatedto be chewed before swallowing (chewable tablets or gums) should containthe following warning: ``Do not take this product for at least 7 days aftertonsillectomy or oral surgery except under the advice and supervision ofa physician'' (47 FR 35385). The agency believes that prohibiting the useof aspirin for 7 days after oral surgery is reasonable and is recommendingthis as a required warning.The agency also believes that the recommended warnings can be shortenedby combining them into a single statement and that the phrase ``exceptunder the advice and supervision of a dentist or doctor'' should be addedto the combined warning. In addition, the agency believes that consumersmay not understand the meaning of the word ``anticoagulant.'' In the tentativefinal monograph for OTC internal analgesic drug products, to be publishedin a future issue of the <T4>Federal Register</T4>, the agency plans to explain the word ``anticoagulation''by placing the words ``thinning the blood'' in parentheses after it. Thesame approach is being recommended in this tentative final monograph also.The agency is recommending that the following warning be included in thefinal monograph for OTC oral health care drug products if aspirin in achewing gum base becomes a Category I ingredient in this rulemaking:<ITAG tagnum="21">Do not use if you have a bleeding problem, if you are taking a prescriptiondrug for anticoagulation (thinning the blood), if your mouth is highlyirritated or ulcerated, or for at least 7 days after surgery in the mouthor throat except under the advice and supervision of a dentist or doctor.</ITAG>In conclusion, in this tentative final monograph, the agency is classifyingaspirin in a chewing gum base in Category III for effectiveness and inCategory I for safety as a topical anesthetic/analgesic active ingredientfor use in the oral cavity. If this ingredient is included in the finalmonograph for OTC oral health care drug products, the agency will considerthe need for any additional warnings that are required for aspirin in thefinal monograph for OTC internal analgesic drug products.<ITAG tagnum="74">References</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Loch, W.E.E., et al., ``Local Aspirin Analgesia in the Oral Cavity,''<T3>Clinical Pharmacology and Therapeutics, </T3>33:642-648, 1983.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Scott, D., Jr., ``Aspirin: Action on Receptor in the Tooth,''<T3>Science,</T3> 161:180-181, 1968.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Adriani, J., S. Minokadeh, and M. Naraghi, ``Effectiveness onMucous Membranes of Topically Applied Antipyretic Analgesics,'' <T3>Regional Anesthesia, </T3>6:47-50, 1981.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) OTC Volume 13ATFM.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Davenport, H.W., ``Gastric Mucosal Injury by Fatty and AcetylsalicylicAcids,'' <T3>Gastroenterology, </T3>46:245-253, 1964.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Reuter, S.H., and W.W. Montgomery, ``Aspirin vs. Acetaminophenafter Tonsillectomy: A Comparative Double-Blind Study,'' <T3>Archives of Otolaryngology, </T3>80:214-217, 1964.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) Kawashima, Z., R.H. Flagg, and D.E. Cox, ``Aspirin-Induced OralLesion: Report of Case,'' <T3>Journal of the American Dental Association, </T3>91:130-131, 1975.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) Claman, H.N., ``Mouth Ulcers Associated with Prolonged Chewingof Gum Containing Aspirin,'' <T3>Journal of the American Medical Association, </T3>202:651-652, 1967.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(9) Roth, J.L.A., et al., ``Topical Action of Salicylates in GastrointestinalErosion and Hemorrhage,'' <T3>Gastroenterology, </T3>44:146-158, 1963.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(10) Singer, R., ``Acetylsalicylic Acid, A Probable Cause for SecondaryPost-Tonsillectomy Hemorrhage,'' <T3>Archives of Otolaryngology, </T3>42:19-20, 1945.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(11) Hersh, R. A., ``A Clinical Study Comparing the Incidence of PostoperativeBleeding in Patients Using Salicylate-containing Analgesics versus AcetaminophenAnalgesics,'' <T3>Bulletin of the Bergen County Dental Society, </T3>40:6-8 and 16, 1974.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(12) Fox, S. L., and G. B. West, ``Vitamin K and Late Tonsillar Hemorrhage,''<T3>Laryngoscope, </T3>51:564-574, 1947.</ITAG>16. One comment requested that the agency revise the Category I dosageschedule for topical aspirin as follows: <ITAG tagnum="15">Adults_325-500 mg every 4 hours as needed not to exceed 3,900 mg in24 hours.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Children 9 to 11_200-500 mg every 4 hours as needed, not to exceed2,030 mg in 24 hours.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Children 6 to 8_130-325 mg every 4 hours as needed, not to exceed1,625 mg in 24 hours. </ITAG>The comment maintained that most of the efficacy and safety data and experiencesubmitted to the Panel for evaluation was based upon a formulation containing227 mg aspirin per gum tablet and that this concentration is not includedin the Panel's recommended dosage schedule. The comment stated that theproposed revision takes into account the actual Category I dosage range(130 to 500 mg) officially approved by the Panel at its December 14, 1979meeting, provides an age-dependent dosage as proposed in the Panel's majorityreport on aspirin, and provides a Category I dosage range that includesthe currently available products.The agency believes that a specific dosage schedule for topically appliedaspirin in a chewing gum base cannot be proposed at this time because ofthe absence of actual study data to support such a dosage schedule. Althoughthe comment proposes doses as low as 130 mg aspirin, no data were submittedto the Panel or the agency that would support the topical analgesic effectivenessof such a low dose of aspirin. As the comment stated, most of the informationsubmitted to the Panel for evaluation (Ref. 1) was derived from a productcontaining 227 mg aspirin per tablet in a chewing gum base. Other datasubmitted to the agency regarding the topical analgesic effectiveness ofaspirin (Ref. 2) were based on a dose of 210 mg of aspirin, but that amountwas in an aqueous solution, not a chewing gum base. Neither dose was shownto be effective.Therefore, the agency disagrees with the Panel's Category I classificationof aspirin in a chewing gum base as an oral health care topical analgesic/anestheticdrug product and is proposing a Category III classification for this ingredient.(See comment 15 above.) Consequently, the agency is not proposing a dosageschedule for this ingredient as an oral health care drug product. In theevent that aspirin in a chewing gum base reaches monograph status (CategoryI), the agency will establish an appropriate dosage at that time, basedon the supporting data.<ITAG tagnum="72">References</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) OTC Volume 130104.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Loch, W. E. E, et al., ``Local Aspirin Analgesia in the Oral Cavity,''<T3>Clinical Pharmacology and Therapeutics, </T3>33:642-648, 1983.</ITAG>17. One comment maintained that because aspirin in a chewing gum base canbe labeled for use as an internal analgesic and/or a topical analgesic,provisions should be made to allow the warnings to be consolidated. Itstated that the 2-day administration restriction should be identified asapplicable only when treating sore throat, and that the 5-day to 10-dayrestriction would be applicable to internal analgesic use.In this document, aspirin is classified in Category III for effectivenessas a topical anesthetic/analgesic ingredient. (See comment 15 above.) However,if aspirin is included in the final monograph for OTC oral health caredrug products as well as in the final monograph for OTC internal analgesic,antipyretic, and antirheumatic drug products, a product could display labelingfrom both monographs. For example, manufacturers may indicate on the labelthat the 2-day usage limitation is applicable only when treating sore throat,and that the 5-day to 10-day restriction on use applies when aspirin isused as an internal analgesic for the temporary relief of minor aches andpains such as headaches. Manufacturers may combine warnings, indications,and directions, respectively, to eliminate duplicative words or phrasesso that the resulting information is clear and understandable.18. One comment maintained that the Panel's recommended warning in andSection;356.50(c)(2)(v), ``Provide good fluid intake when aspirin or aspirin-containingpreparations are used'' is unnecessary for products containing aspirinin a chewing gum form because the process of chewing generates sufficientsaliva to prevent pharyngeal or esophageal irritation. The comment addedthat the topical effect of aspirin could be diminished by the administrationof liquids immediately after chewing the gum tablets. Therefore, the commentrequested that the agency delete this warning for these drug products.In this document, aspirin is classified as Category III for effectivenessas a topical anesthetic/analgesic ingredient. (See comment 15 above.) However,the agency agrees with the comment that if aspirin in a chewing gum baseis shown to have a topical analgesic effect in the oral cavity, that effectcould be negated or diminished by drinking water after chewing the tablets.In addition, the agency believes that the process of chewing the aspirin-containinggum produces enough saliva to prevent any irritation the aspirin mightcause in the oral cavity. Therefore, if aspirin in a chewing gum base isincluded as a topical anesthetic/analgesic ingredient in the final monographfor OTC oral health care drug products, the agency proposes that the warningrecommended by the Panel in andSection; 356.50(c)(2)(v) should not be required.C. General Comments on Debriding Agent/Oral Wound Cleanser Drug Products19. Noting that the Dental Panel and the Oral Cavity Panel reviewed someof the same ingredients (i.e., carbamide peroxide and hydrogen peroxide)used at similar concentrations at the same or adjacent sites in the oralcavity, one comment pointed out similarities between the Oral Cavity Panel'sdefinition of a debriding agent (47 FR 22927) and the Dental Panel's definitionof an oral wound cleanser (44 FR 63289). The comment stated that the removalof foreign material by debriding agents and by oral wound cleansers isaccomplished by utilizing oxygen-releasing moieties whose foaming actionmechanically and chemically removes devitalized tissue, mucus, phlegm,etc. The comment claimed that it is confusing and misleading to consumerswhen the same ingredients, used for the same therapeutic purpose at thesame or adjacent sites, have different labeling. The comment requestedthat the definitions, warnings, and indications be consistent between thetwo monographs.The agency has reviewed the definitions, warnings, and indications fordebriding agents in the Oral Cavity Panel's report (47 FR 22927 to 22929)and for oral wound cleansers in the tentative final monograph for OTC oralmucosal injury drug products (48 FR 33992 to 33993). The agency agreeswith the comment that there are many similarities between debriding agentsand oral wound cleansers. The Dental Panel defined an oral wound cleanseras ``a nonirritating preparation that assists (physically or chemically)in the removal of foreign material from minor oral wounds and does notdelay wound healing'' (44 FR 63289). The Oral Cavity Panel defined a debridingagent as ``an agent which causes removal of foreign material or devitalizedor contaminated tissue from or adjacent to a traumatic or infected lesionto expose surrounding healthy tissue'' (47 FR 22927).Debriding agents remove debris by either a mechanical, chemical, biochemical,or physicochemical mechanism of action, such as the release of oxygen,the lowering of pH, and by osmosis (47 FR 22905). Oral wound cleansers,generally, achieve the physical removal of debris by releasing oxygen,which results in a foaming action (44 FR 63280). The agency believes thatthe therapeutic effect of debriding agents and oral wound cleansers isthe same, i.e., removal of foreign or devitalized materials from minorwounds or inflammations in the oral cavity. Because of the overlap and similarities in the definitions, therapeuticeffect, mechanisms of action, and site of action of oral wound cleansersand debriding agents, the agency has decided to incorporate part of therulemaking for OTC oral mucosal injury drug products into this tentativefinal monograph for oral health care drug products. The tentative finalmonograph for OTC oral mucosal injury drug products was published in the<T4>Federal Register </T4>of July 26, 1983 (48 FR 33984) and proposed conditionsunder which OTC oral wound cleansers and oral wound healing agents wouldbe generally recognized as safe and effective. Only oral wound cleansingingredients and labeling are included in this segment of the oral healthcare tentative final monograph. The combination of an oral wound cleanserand an oral antiseptic proposed in andSection; 353.20(b) of the tentativefinal monograph for OTC oral mucosal injury drug products will be addressedin the second segment (i.e., oral health care antimicrobial drug products)of this rulemaking. Oral wound healing agents were addressed in a finalrule published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of July 18, 1986 (51 FR 26112). Definitions relevantto oral wound cleansers are being proposed in andSection; 356.3 of this tentativefinal monograph. Indications, warnings, and directions relevant to oralwound cleansers are incorporated into andSection; 356.70 of this tentativefinal monograph, which pertains to debriding agents. The resultant classof ingredients will hereafter be identified as oral health care debridingagent/oral wound cleansers. 20. One comment stated that although it does not recognize a therapeuticbenefit from the use of cleansing and debriding agents, it is generallyaccepted that several agents are effective at cleansing and debriding theoral mucosa. The comment agreed with the Panel's recommendations that thefollowing agents are safe and effective for those indications: hydrogenperoxide, sodium bicarbonate, and carbamide peroxide in anhydrous glycerin.One reply comment noted that the comment partially agreed with the Panel'sfindings on cleansing and debriding agents, but that the comment did notrecognize the therapeutic benefit of debriding agents, as did the Panel,and that both the Oral Cavity Panel and the Dental Panel placed debridingagents in Category I. The reply comment urged the agency to maintain theCategory I indications for debriding agents. The agency agrees with the Panel's conclusion that debriding agents aredrugs that provide a therapeutic benefit to the target population becausethey aid in the symptomatic relief of sore mouth and sore throat by removingthick, tenacious mucus, purulent secretions, and debris that may stimulatepain receptors in ulcerated or inflamed areas of the mouth and throat (47FR 22905). Therefore, the agency is proposing Category I indications fororal health care debriding agents in this tentative final mongraph. 21. One comment agreed that the Panel's recommended drug claims are appropriatefor debriding agents, but argued that these ingredients are also usefulas mechanical cleansers that perform an important cosmetic function. Thecomment requested that debriding agents be available for use in oral hygieneproducts intended solely for cleansing the mouth for cosmetic purposes.Products marketed only as cosmetics are not subject to this rulemaking.Because the final mongraph will cover only the drug use of the active ingredientslisted therein, the concentration range, limitations, statements of identity,indications, warnings, and directions established for these ingredientsin the monograph will not apply to the use of the same ingredients in productsintended solely as cosmetics. However, if a product is intended for bothdrug and cosmetic use, it must conform to the requirements of the finalmonograph. In addition to the indications allowed for OTC oral health caredrug products, such products may also bear appropriate labeling for cosmeticuses, in conformity with section 602 of the Act (21 U.S.C. 362) and theprovisions of 21 CFR Parts 701 and 740.In accordance with the final rule on the agency's ``exclusivity policy''(51 FR 16258), it is the agency's view that cosmetic claims may not appearwithin the boxed area designated ``APPROVED USES.'' As discussed at 51FR 16264 (paragraph 14), cosmetic claims may appear elsewhere in the labelingbut not in the box should manufacturers choose the labeling alternativeprovided in andSection; 330.1(c)(2) (i) or (iii) for labeling cosmetic/drugproducts.22. Two comments disagreed with the Panel's Category II classificationof sodium perborate monohydrate as an oral health care debriding agent(47 FR 22908). One comment stated that the Panel did not thoroughly evaluatethe available data. The other comment stated that a review of the informationin the Panel's report did not justify a Category II classification forsodium perborate monohydrate from the standpoint of safety.In the tentative final monograph for OTC oral mucosal injury drug products(48 FR 33984), the agency concluded that sodium perborate monohydrate issafe for use in the oral cavity as an oral wound cleanser if the ingredientis limited to dosage units of not more than 1.2 g (to be dissolved in 30mL of water) and if its use in children under 6 years of age is prohibited.The agency also concluded that 1.2 g sodium perborate monohydrate releases1.3 to 1.4 percent hydrogen peroxide (a Category I oral wound cleanser)and therefore may be considered an effective oral wound cleanser becausethe activity of hydrogen peroxide-containing compounds is a physical phenomenonbased on the foaming action caused by the release of molecular oxygen whenthe compound comes into contact with tissue or saliva (48 FR 33986). Thefoaming action loosens and lifts out debris, thus cleansing the wound.As stated in comment 19 above, the agency is incorporating part of therulemaking on OTC oral mucosal injury drug products into the sections ofthis tentative final monograph pertaining to debriding agents. Therefore,the agency is proposing a Category I classification for sodium perboratemonohydrate as a debriding agent/oral wound cleanser. The agency also concludesthat the directions proposed for sodium perborate monohydrate as an oralwound cleanser are appropriate for sodium perborate monohydrate as a debridingagent/oral wound cleanser. (See andSection; 353.50(d)(3) at 48 FR 33993.)Therefore, with minor format modifications, those directions are beingproposed in this tentative final monograph.23. One comment referred to the Oral Cavity Panel's statement that long-term,daily use of peroxides can cause gingival inflammation, tooth decalcification,and black hairy tongue (47 FR 22875). The comment maintained that the statementlacked the scientific clarification found in the report on OTC oral mucosalinjury drug products (44 FR 63281), i.e., that only high concentrations(6 to 30 percent) of hydrogen peroxide may cause these adverse reactions.The comment stated that these adverse reactions are not associated withcurrently marketed products containing 3 percent hydrogen peroxide and10 to 15 percent carbamide peroxide. The comment concluded that long-termsafety is not at issue because debriding agents and oral wound cleansersare generally used intermittently for a week or less, and that the literaturedoes not support a lack of safety in humans during either long-term orshort-term use.The agency notes that the Oral Cavity Panel provided a more detailed explanationof the possible adverse effects from the use of high concentrations ofperoxide (6 to 30 percent) (47 FR 22875 to 22877) than the Dental Panel(44 FR 63281 to 63282). The Oral Cavity Panel discussed more studies showingadverse changes in the gingival tissue and the tongue as a result of thefrequent use of hydrogen peroxide at high concentrations. The Dental Panelmentioned only a few of the studies showing adverse effects. Therefore,the agency rejects the comment's contention that the report on OTC oralmucosal injury drug products contains a clearer scientific explanationof the adverse effects of high concentration of hydrogen peroxide thanthe report on OTC oral health care drug products.The Oral Cavity Panel was concerned about the chronic use of hydrogen peroxidein such products as antimicrobial-containing mouthwashes as well as theshort-term use in debriding agents. The Dental Panel was only concernedabout the short-term use of hydrogen peroxide in oral wound cleansers.One reference cited by the Oral Cavity Panel stated that hydrogen peroxideshould not be used as a mouthwash for long periods of time because of itsacidity and because hydrogen peroxide at low concentrations can decalcifyteeth (Ref. 1).Because both Panels concluded that concentrations of hydrogen peroxideup to 3 percent are safe for short-term use only, adverse reactions resultingfrom the use of higher concentrations are not relevant to this segmentof the oral health care rulemaking. However, possible adverse reactionsresulting from the chronic use of hydrogen peroxide at low concentrationsare relevant to the antimicrobial segment of the rulemaking for OTC oralhealth care drug products because antimicrobial-containing mouthwashesmay be used for extended periods of time. Possible adverse reactions resultingfrom the chronic use of hydrogen peroxide as a mouthwash will be discussedin the antimicrobial segment of this rulemaking. Therefore, the agencydisagrees with the comment that long-term safety is not an issue.<ITAG tagnum="74">Reference</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Dobbs, E.C., ``Pharmacology and Oral Therapeutics,'' 12th Ed.,C.V. Mosby Co., St. Louis, p. 427, 1961.</ITAG>24. One comment requested that the ``description'' of carbamide peroxidein andSection; 356.14(a) be revised to indicate that the active ingredientis carbamide peroxide in anhydrous glycerin and that andSection; 356.54(d)(1)be revised to agree with the Panel's description of carbamide peroxidein its discussion at 47 FR 22905. The comment explained that it is incorrectto describe carbamide peroxide as a solution in water, as in the directionsin andSection; 356.54(d)(1), because the ingredient is not available as anaqueous solution inasmuch as it degrades to urea and hydrogen peroxidewhen contacting water. Referring to andSection; 356.14(a), the comment explainedthat carbamide peroxide alone is also incorrect because degradation occursif carbamide peroxide is present as a single unstabilized ingredient.       The agency concludes that andSection;andSection; 356.14(a) and 356.54(d)(1)of the advance notice of proposed rulemaking should be revised as requestedby the comment. Because carbamide peroxide is an unstable compound thatbreaks down if exposed to air or water, it is stabilized by formulationin anhydrous glycerin (47 FR 22863). (Anhydrous glycerin may be preparedby heating glycerin USP at 150 anddegrees;C for 2 hours to drive off themoisture content.) Therefore, in this tentative final monograph, the agencyis proposing that andSection; 356.16(a) read as follows: ``Carbamide peroxidein anhydrous glycerin.'' In addition, because carbamide peroxide is unstablein water (44 FR 63281), and it is neither formulated in water nor usedin aqueous solution, the agency is not including any reference to a solutioncontaining carbamide peroxide in water in the directions proposed in andSection;356.70(d)(1) of this tentative final monograph. (See comment 27 below.)       25. One comment noted that, although the definition of a debriding agentrefers to its action on unhealthy tissues (47 FR 22927), the indicationfor a debriding agent recommended by the Panel in andSection; 356.54(d) (47FR 22929) limits use only to ``Aids in the removal of phlegm, mucus, orother secretions in the temporary relief of discomfort due to occasionalsore throat and sore mouth.'' The comment suggested that the indicationbe expanded to include the activity noted in the definition section regardingremoval of oral secretions, foreign material, and devitalized or contaminatedtissue from or adjacent to a lesion or irritated tissue which can occurin sore mouth, sore throat, and sore gums.        The comment suggested that andSection; 356.54(b) be revised by adding thefollowing:        (1) ``For temporary use in cleansing of wounds caused by minor oral irritationor injury such as following minor dental procedures or from dentures ororthodontic appliances.''        (2) ``For temporary use in the cleansing of gum irritation due to eruptingteeth (teething).''        The first indication suggested by the comment is similar in content tothe indication proposed by the agency in andSection;353.50(b)(1)(i) of thetentative final monograph for OTC oral mucosal injury drug products (48FR 33993). The second indication proposed by the comment is identical tothe professional labeling proposed in andSection; 353.80 of that tentativefinal monograph. The agency is incorporating the proposed indications andprofessional labeling for oral wound cleansers into andSection;andSection;356.70 and 356.80 of this tentative final monograph. (See comment 19 above.)The comment's concern has been addressed by this action.        26. One comment stated that the Oral Cavity Panel recommended that debridingagents be used no longer than 2 days without professional supervision,whereas the Dental Panel proposed that the same active ingredients, whenused as oral wound cleansers, should not be used longer than 7 days withoutprofessional supervision (44 FR 63282). Adding that the 7-day use limitprovided for oral wound cleansers better approximates the healing timeneeded to effectively repair mucous membrane irritation and lesion, thecomment cited the American Dental Association's notation that mild andasymptomatic oral lesions generally require 5 to 10 days for healing (Ref.1). The comment recommended that the 2-day limit proposed for debridingagents be revised to the 7-day limit recommended for oral wound cleansers.       The comment also noted that the Oral Cavity Panel recommended that childrencan use debriding agents at age 3 (47 FR 22906), whereas the Dental Panelstated that children can use oral wound cleansers at age 2 (44 FR 63281).The comment recommended the use of debriding agents by children 2 yearsof age and older because limited toxicity is associated with the CategoryI ingredients and because teething in children may necessitate the useof a ``debriding agent/oral wound cleanser.'' The comment further statedthat it is unnecessarily alarming to include the age limitations in thewarnings section and recommended that reference to age be deleted fromthe warnings section of the labeling of debriding agents because the agelimit is included in the directions.               In addition, the comment requested that the reference in andSection; 356.54(c)(1)(ii)to a rash appearing on the skin after use of a debriding agent be deletedbecause the appearance of a rash is neither noted in, nor supported by,the safety reviews of any of the debriding agents.Accordingly, the comment suggested the following warning for OTC oral healthcare debriding agents:<ITAG tagnum="21">(i) If improvement is not seen after 7 days of use, discontinue useand see a physician. Severe or persistent sore throat, or sore throat accompaniedby high fever, headache, nausea, and vomiting may be serious. Consult physicianpromptly.</ITAG>The agency has decided to incorporate portions of the rulemaking for OTCoral mucosal injury drug products into this tentative final monograph andto consider debriding agents and oral wound cleansers as one therapeuticclass called debriding agent/oral wound cleansers. (See comment 19 above.)In addition, because this therapeutic class of ingredients (i.e., debridingagent/oral wound cleansers) has not historically been used for the reliefof sore throat symptoms and because the therapeutic benefits of using theseingredients for sore throat symptoms are not apparent, the agency is proposingthat debriding agent/oral wound cleansers be limited to use only in relievingsymptoms associated with a sore mouth.The Oral Cavity Panel recommended that all OTC oral health care drug productsbe used for sore throat in addition to sore mouth. Therefore, the Panelrecommended the 2-day use limit for all of these products because of therisk of serious illness if appropriate treatment of a sore throat is delayed.However, in its discussion of sore mouth, the Panel stated that althoughsore mouth may denote the presence of a condition that requires diagnosisand treatment by a physician, in most cases it is caused by minor ulcerationsand other benign conditions that are self-limited and generally heal spontaneouslyin 7 to 10 days (47 FR 22774 to 22776).In the tentative final monograph for OTC oral mucosal injury drug products,the agency agreed with the Dental Panel that even though the presence ofan oral lesion or inflammation can be a symptom of a serious disease, oralwound cleansers may be used for up to 7 days without consulting a physicianor dentist (48 FR 33993). Because debriding agent/oral wound cleansersin this tentative final monograph are indicated only for use to relievethe symptoms associated with sore mouth, and sore mouth is unlikely tobe indicative of a serious health threat, the agency is proposing thatdebriding agent/oral wound cleansers can be safely used to relieve thesymptoms associated with sore mouth for up to 7 days before seeking professionalguidance.The agency agrees with the comment that the lowest age for use of debridingagents by children should be 2 years. These active ingredients are appliedtopically and are only inadvertently ingested. In general, they exhibitlow toxicity (47 FR 22905). Therefore, the agency is proposing that thelower age limit for use of OTC oral health care debriding agent/oral woundcleansers except sodium perborate monohydrate (see comment 22 above) shouldbe 2 years. In addition, the agency agrees with the comment that becausethe age limitations are in the directions, they are not necessary in thewarning statements.The agency believes that the comment has misinterpreted the warning statementconcerning the appearance of a rash. The Oral Cavity Panel's warning statementis not meant to imply that the appearance of a rash is an adverse reactioncaused by the use of a debriding agent/oral wound cleanser. Rather, theappearance of a rash may be a symptom of serious diseases, such as scarletfever, measles, or chicken pox, which can appear after initial sore mouthsymptoms and which require professional advice and supervision (47 FR 22776).Thus, reference to a rash is an appropriate part of the warning statementsfor debriding agent/oral wound cleansers.The agency believes that, with minor modification, the warning proposedin andSection; 353.50(c) of the tentative final monograph for OTC oral mucosalinjury drug products is appropriate for the oral health care debridingagent/oral wound cleansers included in this tentative final monograph andthat this warning can be combined with the Oral Cavity Panel's recommendedwarning in andSection; 356.54(c)(1)(ii). Therefore, the agency is proposingto replace the warnings recommended by the Oral Cavity Panel in andSection;356.54(c)(1) with the following warning: ``Do not use this product formore than 7 days unless directed by a dentist or doctor. If sore mouthsymptoms do not improve in 7 days; if irritation, pain, or redness persistsor worsens; or if swelling, rash, or fever develops, see your dentist ordoctor promptly.'' This warning is proposed in andSection; 356.70(c)(1) ofthis tentative final monograph.<ITAG tagnum="72">Reference</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) ``Accepted Dental Therapeutics,'' 38th ed., Council on DentalTherapeutics of the American Dental Association, Chicago, p. 292, 1979.</ITAG>27. One comment stated that the directions recommended by the Oral CavityPanel for carbamide peroxide do not reflect the labeling and use of theproducts submitted to the agency for review. The comment suggested thatthe directions for carbamide peroxide as an oral wound cleanser in andSection;353.50(d)(1) of the Dental Panel's recommended monograph for OTC oral mucosalinjury drug products would, if modified to include use as a rinse in additionto use by direct application, be appropriate for carbamide peroxide asa debriding agent. The comment requested that the agency revise the directionsfor carbamide peroxide as a debriding agent and make the directions fordebriding agents in this tentative final monograph consistent with thedirections for oral wound cleansers in the recommended monograph for OTCoral mucosal injury drug products.As discussed in comment 19 above, the agency is incorporating portionsof the tentative final monograph for OTC oral mucosal injury drug productsinto this mongraph. The agency believes that, with minor format changes,the directions it proposed for carbamide peroxide and hydrogen peroxideas oral wound cleansers (48 FR 33993) are also appropriate for those ingredientswhen used as debriding agent/oral wound cleansers. The agency also believesthat these directions reflect the labeling and use of products submittedto the agency for review. Therefore, with minor format changes, the directionsproposed in andSection; 353.50(d)(1) and (2) of the tentative final monographfor OTC oral mucosal injury drug products are being proposed in this tentativefinal monograph.D. General Comments on Decongestant and Expectorant Drug Products28. One comment maintained that the Oral Cavity Panel misconstrued theapplication of decongestants and of expectorants in the products that itreviewed. The comment stated that decongestant ingredients have their activityin relieving nasal congestion via absorption and systemic distribution,and expectorant drugs have their activity in relieving bronchial secretionproblems via reflex action stimulated in the stomach or via action in thepulmonary tree by absorption and systemic distribution. The effectivenessof these ingredients should not be part of the oral health care monograph,the comment concluded, but should be referred to the monograph for OTCcough-cold drug products.The Oral Cavity Panel deferred most of the decongestant active ingredientsto the Cough-Cold Panel because most of these ingredients are administeredorally or topically (47 FR 22909). However, the Oral Cavity Panel foundthat some decongestant ingredients were combined with oral health careingredients in the form of lozenges and felt that these decongestant ingredientscould have topical activity on the mucous membranes of the mouth and throat.The Oral Cavity Panel did review two submissions on products containingphenylephrine hydrochloride and phenylpropanolamine hydrochloride as decongestantsin lozenge form (Ref. 1). However, the two ingredients were present inlozenges that were labeled for the relief of nasal congestion, not congestionof the mouth or throat. Therefore, the agency agrees with the comment thatthe Oral Cavity Panel misconstrued the application of decongestant ingredientsin these oral health care drug products and the data on decongestants shouldbe referred to the nasal decongestant segment of the rulemaking for OTCcough-cold drug products. These decongestant ingredients will be discussedwithin the context of the rulemaking for OTC nasal decongestant drug productsin a future issue of the <T4>Federal Register.</T4>Both the Cough-Cold Panel and the Oral Cavity Panel reviewed data on thesafety and effectiveness of ingredients used as expectorants in OTC drugproducts. The Cough-Cold Panel reviewed 20 expectorants, classifying 6in Category II and 14 in Category III. The Oral Cavity Panel reviewed onlyfour expectorants, classifying one in Category II and three in CategoryIII. The Cough-Cold Panel reviewed three of the four ingredients that werereviewed later by the Oral Cavity Panel. Both panels classified these threeingredients in the same categories. Because most of the expectorants hadbeen reviewed earlier and more extensively by the Cough-Cold Panel, theagency agrees with the comment that the data on the effectiveness of expectorantactive ingredients should be incorporated into the expectorant segmentof the rulemaking for OTC cough-cold drug products. These ingredients willbe discussed in the final monograph for OTC expectorant drug products,to be published in a future issue of the <T4>Federal Register.</T4>Therefore, for the above reasons, and because no data were submitted insupport of the effectiveness of any decongestant or expectorant ingredientfor oral health care use, the agency is not including decongestants andexpectorants in this tentative final monograph.<ITAG tagnum="72">Reference</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) OTC Volumes 130032 and 130058.</ITAG>E. General Comments on Demulcent Drug Products29. Citing the Panel's discussion of demulcents (47 FR 22915) as ``* ** mucilaginous substances composed of gums, mucilages, starches, high molecularweight polymers of polyhydric alcohols, polysaccharides, certain saccharides* * * ,'' one comment stated that sugars and sorbitol were overlooked bythe Panel. The comment stated that two specific submissions to the Panelpresented human clinical evidence supporting the demulcent action of sugar(Ref. 1) and sorbitol (Ref. 2), but that the Panel did not act on or respondto either of these submissions. The comment also referred to a study inwhich patients suffering with sore throat obtained pain relief with a plain,unflavored hard candy lozenge, a flavored hard candy lozenge, and a 2.4-mghexylresorcinol lozenge (Ref. 3). The comment stated that in this studythe demulcent effect of a sugar base lozenge was apparent both immediatelyafter the dissolution of the lozenge and 5 minutes later.The comment urged FDA to include sugars (such as sucrose, glucose, fructose,and dextrins) and sorbitol as approved demulcents in the oral health carerulemaking. In addition, the comment requested that, because sugars andsorbitol are usually the major components by weight in oral health carelozenges and syrups and because they are produced for and recognized asfood substances, they should be allowed to be controlled for quality inaccordance with the Current Good Manufacturing Practice (CGMP) regulationsfor foods, rather than for drugs. The comment also suggested an alternativeapproach that would allow demulcent claims for sugars and sorbitol whenthese ingredients form the major solid content of an oral health care drugproduct, but would not require their listing as active ingredients.The agency has reviewed the studies (Refs. 1, 2, and 3) cited by the commentin support of its recommendation to include sugars and sorbitol as CategoryI demulcents in this rulemaking. The agency concludes that these studiesprovide insufficient data to support the effectiveness of sugars or sorbitolas Category I demulcents in lozenges or syrups when used in OTC oral healthcare drug products.In the studies claimed by the comment to contain clinical evidence supportingthe demulcent activity of sugars and sorbitol, the antitussive effectivenessof sugars and sorbitol was tested by the citric acid aerosol challenge-coughinduction technique (Refs. 1 and 2). The agency concludes that these inductionstudies do not clearly demonstrate the demulcent effectiveness of sugarsor sorbitol because the subjects studied did not have a sore mouth andsore throat. The Panel recommended the following indication for oral healthcare demulcents: ``Aids in the temporary relief of minor discomfort andprotects irritated areas in sore mouth and sore throat.'' Therefore, studiesconducted to demonstrate the demulcent effect of ingredients must be conductedin the correct target population, i.e., subjects with a sore mouth or sorethroat. The reduction of citric acid aerosol induced-cough does not demonstratethat an ingredient relieves sore mouth and sore throat symptoms by a demulcentaction.The multiclinic study mentioned by the comment, involving 225 volunteersin 3 separate medication groups, was designed to evaluate the safety andeffectiveness of hexylresorcinol in the treatment of pain due to simplesore throat (Ref. 3). This double-blind, placebo-controlled study comparedthe effectiveness of a candy-based, 2.4-mg hexylresorcinol lozenge withtwo candy-based placebo lozenges, one flavored and one unflavored. Thedegree of relief from sore throat pain was subjectively evaluated immediatelyand 5 minutes after dissolution of each test lozenge. The agency's reviewof the results showed that there was some immediate subjective relief ofsore throat pain in all groups tested and that the degree of relief wasvirtually the same in all three groups. At 5 minutes, the relief of sorethroat pain provided by the hexylresorcinol lozenge was significantly betterthan the relief provided by the candy-based control lozenges (pandless;0.05);nevertheless, the control lozenges provided some sore throat relief. Thisstudy does not demonstrate the effectiveness of sugar as a demulcent inlozenges because the ingredients used to formulate the candy-based lozengesare not identified or quantitated and because both unmedicated lozengeswere candy-based. Therefore, the study was not adequately designed or controlledand does not demonstrate the effectiveness of sugar in the form of a lozengeas a demulcent (Ref. 3).In its report, the Panel included dextrose, sugar, and sorbitol as inactiveingredients or pharmaceutical necessities (47 FR 22764). The agency notesthat sugars and sorbitol are usually considered pharmaceutical necessitiesin the manufacture and formulation of oral health care drug products. Althoughthe data reviewed by the agency are inadequate to demonstrate the effectivenessof sugars or sorbitol as oral health care demulcents, the agency agreeswith the comment that sugars and sorbitol may have demulcent activity whenused in lozenge or syrup form. Therefore, the agency is proposing in thistentative final monograph to classify sugars and sorbitol as Category IIIdemulcents when present as the major component of oral health care formulationssuch as a syrup or lozenge.With regard to the comment's suggestion that sugars and sorbitol in OTCoral health care drug products should be controlled for quality in accordancewith the CGMP regulations for foods (21 CFR Part 110), the agency notesthat when sugars and sorbitol are included in products intended for useas food, they are required to meet the requirements of the CGMP regulationsfor foods. However, when sugars and sorbitol are used in the formulationof drug products, they are ``components'' (21 CFR 210.3(b)(3)) of the finisheddrug products and, as such, they must meet all appropriate CGMP requirementsapplicable to drug components (21 CFR Parts 210 and 217).Therefore, the agency recognizes that sugars and sorbitol can be includedas inactive pharmaceutical ingredients in oral health care drug products.However, as stated above, the agency is also proposing to classify sugarsand sorbitol in Category III as demulcents if demulcent claims are attributedto their presence in oral health care formulations such as syrups and lozenges.The agency notes, however, that terms such as ``soothing'' may be usedto describe the action of a sugar-based syrup or lozenge. This term isnot a demulcent claim but describes certain physical and chemical attributesof a drug product and is distinctly separate from labeling indications.Terms describing product characteristics (e.g., color, odor, flavor, andfeel) appear in the labeling for the consumers' information. Because suchclaims are not directly related to the safe and effective use of OTC oralhealth care drug products, the agency considers these claims to be outsidethe scope of the monograph. Any term that is outside the scope of the monographmay appear in any portion of the labeling not required by the monograph,but such labeling may not detract from the required information. Therefore,an OTC oral health care drug product could be described in the followingmanner in that portion of the labeling not required by the monograph: ``A* * * drug product formulated in a soothing sugar (or sorbitol) base.''<ITAG tagnum="72">References</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) OTC Volume 130095.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) OTC Volume 130146.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Sabesin, S. M., and T. H. Weaber, Jr., ``Multi-clinic SUCRETSSore Throat Lozenge Study,'' draft of unpublished study, OTC Volume 130030.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">F. General Comments on Combination Drug Products</ITAG>30. Several comments objected to the Panel's recommendation in andSection;356.20(a), which allows an active ingredient identified in andSection;andSection;356.10 through 356.17 to be combined with one or more active ingredientsfrom the same section in full or subtherapeutic doses only when ``thereis a clear demonstration that there is an improvement of safety or enhancedeffectiveness or both.'' The comments contended that limited combinationsto those that show enhanced safety or effectiveness conflicts with FDA'sOTC drug review regulations in 21 CFR 330.10(a)(4)(iv) and with FDA's guidelinesfor OTC combination drug products (Ref. 1), which require only that eachingredient contributes to the claimed effect of the combination product.Two comments noted that the Topical Analgesic Panel classified the combinationof benzocaine and phenol in Category I. (See the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of December 4, 1979; 44 FR 69865.) The commentsmaintained that this combination should be allowed for oral health careuse because phenol has a slower onset of action than benzocaine, but alonger duration of action; and benzocaine has a rapid onset, but a shorterduration of action. The comments acknowledged that proof of effectivenessis necessary if one or both ingredients are present at subtherapeutic levels.However, further testing is unwarranted if both ingredients are presentat therapeutic levels because the ingredients supplement each other andthus have a broader activity.One comment added that useful and acceptable combinations, such as benzocaineand menthol for sore throat (both anesthetic/analgesic active ingredients,but with different mechanisms of action), would be jeopardized by the Panel'srecommended restriction. The comment also stated that there should notbe a restriction against combining menthol with phenol, benzyl alcohol,or salicyl alcohol because menthol contributes cooling and palatabilityto a formulation, thus increasing patient acceptance. According to thecomment, separating the contributions of the two drugs in terms of hardproof of enhanced safety would be extremely difficult and is unnecessaryfor compliance with the FDA guidelines. The comment stated that it interpretsthe guidelines to include patient acceptance, flavor, and other productimprovements as some of the advantages allowed for combination drugs bythe FDA guidelines. The comments recommended that the agency not adoptthe Panel's recommendation regarding enhanced safety or effectiveness (andSection;356.20(a)), but instead follow andSection; 330.10(a)(4)(iv) and FDA's combinationguidelines (Ref. 1).Unlike the agency's combination guidelines, the Panel's recommendationsin andSection; 356.20(a) for combinations of ingredients from the same therapeuticcategory do not differentiate between a combination of ingredients fromthe same therapeutic category with the same mechanism of action and a combinationof ingredients from the same therapeutic category with different mechanismsof action. The combination policy in andSection; 330.10(a)(4)(iv), supplementedby the guidelines for OTC drug combination products (Ref. 1), will be usedby the agency as the criterion for evaluating all OTC combination drugproducts.The agency's guidelines do not require that combinations of ingredientsfrom the same therapeutic category with different mechanisms of actiondemonstrate improved safety and/or enhanced effectiveness. Paragraph 2of the guidelines provides that Category I active ingredients from thesame therapeutic category that have different mechanisms of action maybe combined to treat the same symptoms or condition if the combinationmeets the OTC combination policy in all respects and the combination is,on a benefit-risk basis, equal to or better than each of the active ingredientsused alone at its therapeutic dose. Such combinations may utilize eachactive ingredient in full therapeutic or subtherapeutic dosage, as appropriate.For combinations of ingredients from the same therapeutic category withthe same mechanism of action, paragraph 3 of the guidelines states thatsuch combinations should not ordinarily be combined unless there is someadvantage over the single ingredients in terms of enhanced effectiveness,safety, patient acceptance, or quality of formulation. They may be combinedin selected circumstances to treat the same symptoms or conditions if thecombination meets the OTC combination policy in all respects, the combinationoffers some advantage over the active ingredients used alone, and the combinationis, on a benefit-risk basis, equal to or better than each of the activeingredients used alone at its therapeutic dose.For the above reasons, and based upon the requirements in andSection; 330.10and in the combination guidelines (Ref. 1), the agency is not proposingthe Panel's Category I recommendation for the combinations in andSection;356.20(a). Instead, the agency is classifying all combinations containingtwo or more ingredients from the following pharmacologic groups in CategoryIII except for specific combinations where data have shown a Category Iclassification is appropriate: anesthetic/analgesics identified in andSection;356.10, astringents identified in andSection; 356.12, debriding agent/oralwound cleansers identified in andSection; 356.14 (see comment 33 below),and demulcents identified in andSection; 356.18. Decongestants identifiedin recommended andSection; 356.15 and expectorants identified in recommendedandSection; 356.17 are not being included in this tentative final monographbut are being transferred to the rulemaking for OTC cough-cold drug products.(See comment 28 above.)The agency agrees with the comments that benzocaine and phenol, and benzocaineand menthol are allowable combinations of oral health care anesthetic/analgesicingredients that conform to the requirements in andSection; 330.10 and tothe agency's combination guidelines (Ref. 1). Benzocaine and phenol ormenthol are ingredients from the same therapeutic category but with differentmechanisms of action. In its report, the Topical Analgesic Panel statedthat ``caine''-type drugs (e.g., benzocaine) and alcohol-type topical anesthetics(e.g., phenol and menthol) act at different receptor sites and that a combinationof two may result in an effect that is greater than that produced if eachingredient were used alone (44 FR 69786). The Panel concluded that in combinationssuch as benzocaine and phenol or benzocaine and menthol, a contributionis made by each ingredient and that the attributes added to the combinationsby the ingredients enhance the product's effectiveness and convey a noticeablebenefit to the consumer (44 FR 69786). Despite a minority Panel reportthat disputed this reasoning (44 FR 69787 to 69790), the agency acceptedthe conclusions of the Panel majority and in the tentative final monographfor OTC external analgesic drug products, published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of February 8, 1983 (48 FR 5852), classifiedthe combination of benzocaine with phenol or menthol in Category I. Becausetopical anesthetics behave similarly at different sites of the body (44FR 69788), the agency believes that the combination of benzocaine withphenol or menthol should likewise enhance an oral cavity drug product'seffectiveness, and that such combinations are at least as effective aseach of the active ingredients used alone at its therapeutic dose.The agency is aware that the mucous membranes are more permeable than theskin, and drugs are therefore more rapidly absorbed. Blood levels afterapplication of local anesthetics to the mucous membranes simulate levelsthat would result from intravenous injection (Refs. 2, 3, and 4). Thus,the possibility of systemic effects occurring is greater from drugs usedtopically in the oral cavity than from those used on the intact skin. However,the agency believes that data submitted to the Oral Cavity Panel (Refs.5 and 5) support the safety of the combination of benzocaine with phenolor menthol for use in the oral cavity. A combination drug product containing6.67 percent benzocaine and 0.45 percent phenol was found to be non-toxicand non-irritating (Ref. 5). Rats and mice tolerated large doses givenorally and repeated applications on rabbit gingiva caused no gross or microscopicchanges on the gingival surface or beneath it. Another combination drugproduct containing 6.25 mg benzocaine and 2.5 mg menthol per lozenge wasdemonstrated to be non-toxic to dogs after intragastric administration(Ref. 6). In human safety studies, the combination drug product producedno significant adverse effects in a total of 742 subjects (Ref. 6). Therefore,the agency believes that the combination of benzocaine with phenol or mentholmeets the OTC drug combination policy in all respects and is, on a benefit-riskbasis, equal to or better than each of the active ingredients used alone.Because menthol, phenol, benzyl alcohol, and salicyl alcohol are ingredientsfrom the same therapeutic category with the same mechanism of action, theseingredients should nor normally be combined unless there is some advantageover the single ingredients in terms of enhanced effectiveness, safety,patient acceptance, or quality of formulation. The agency believes thatbecause of its cooling effect, the use of menthol in combination with phenol,benzyl alcohol, or salicyl alcohol may enhance the consumer's acceptanceof a drug product, but no data were submitted to the Panel or the agencydemonstrating any advantage over the single ingredients for the combinationof menthol with phenol, benzyl alcohol, or salicyl alcohol. The agencyis, therefore, proposing a Category III classification for such combinationsin this tentative final monograph. However, menthol, when used as an inactiveingredient, is generally recognized as safe as a flavorant in foods. (See21 CFR 172.515 and 182.20.) Section 172.515 specifies that such flavoringsubstances be ``used in the minimum quantity required to produce theirintended effect and otherwise in accordance with all the principles ofgood manufacturing practice.'' These regulations do not specify an upperconcentration for menthol used as a flavoring agent, and the agency isnot proposing such a limit for OTC drug products at this time. However,the agency invites information and comments on (1) the minimum concentrationof menthol needed to achieve a flavoring effect and (2) the minimum concentrationneeded to achieve a therapeutic effect. The agency will consider such informationin determining how to distinguish between menthol as an active ingredientand whether to establish minimum levels. In any case, if menthol is presentat a therapeutic level in a product, the agency would consider it to bean active ingredient in that product.In summary, the agency is proposing the following Category III combinationsin this tentative final monograph: menthol and phenol, benzyl alcohol,or salicyl alcohol. The following Category I combinations are being proposedin andSection; 356.20:(d) Benzocaine identified in andSection; 356.10(b) may be combined with mentholidentified in andSection; 356.10(e).(e) Benzocaine identified in andSection; 356.10(b) may be combined with phenolidentified in andSection; 356.10(f).<ITAG tagnum="74">References</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Food and Drug Administration, ``General Guidelines for OTC DrugCombination Products,'' September 1978, Docket No. 78D-0322, Dockets ManagementBranch. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Adriani, J., and H. Dalili, ``Penetration of Local AnestheticsThrough Epithelial Barriers,'' <T3>Anesthesia and Analgesia, </T3>50:834-840, 1971.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Adriani, J., ``Some Aspects of Pharmacology of Local Anestheticsof Clinical Importance,'' <T3>Marquette Medical Review, </T3>30:46-52, 1964.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Adriani, J., and D. Campbell, ``Fatalities Following Topical Applicationof Local Anesthetics to Mucous Membranes,'' <T3>Journal of the American Medical Association, </T3>162:1527-1530, 1956.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) OTC Volume 130082.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) OTC Volume 130020.</ITAG>31. One comment agreed with the Panel's recommendations in andSection; 356.20(d), (g), and (j) that combinations of nasal decongestants with anesthetics/analgesicsand with antimicrobials are rational. It did not agree with the Panel'sCategory II classification of the combination of expectorants with anethetics/analgesicsand furthermore believed that the following combinations which were notreviewed by the Panel should be Category I: (1) Decongestants with demulcents; (2) Expectorants with demulcents; (3) Antihistamines with each of the pharmacological groups reviewed bythe Panel; and (4) Antitussives with each of the pharmacological groups reviewed by thePanel.The Oral Cavity Panel considered only those combination drug products forwhich data were submitted pursuant to the notice published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on July 20, 1973 (39 FR 19444). The Panel recognizedthat other combination drug products may exist in the marketplace, butit lacked sufficient data concerning them to make a reasonable judgmentof their safety and effectiveness (47 FR 22791). Thus the Panel did notspecifically address combination drug products containing a decongestantand a demulcent, an expectorant and a demulcent, or an antihistamine oran antitussive and any of the pharmacological groups reviewed by the Panel.The agency recognizes that cold symptoms (e.g., nasal congestion, cough,and runny nose) and sore throat frequently occur concurrently and, forthat reason, combinations of cough/cold active ingredients with oral healthcare active ingredients such as anesthetics/analgesics, antimicrobials,and demulcents may be rational. However, because such combination drugproducts are primarily cough-cold products, they are not being addressedin this document but will be discussed further in the tentative monographfor OTC cold, cough, allergy, bronchodilator, and antiasthmatic combinationdrug products. The agency believes that labeling specific to cough-cold/oralhealth care combination drug products need only appear in one monograph,which should be the one most pertinent to the intended target populationof the combination product. Therefore, the agency has determined that thelabeling for cough-cold/oral health care combination products should beincluded in the combinations segment of the cough-cold tentative finalmonograph. Accordingly, the Panel's specific recommendations in andSection;356.20 (d), (g), and (j) of its monograph are not being addressed in thistentative final monograph. Further, the agency has stated in andSection;356.78(b)(1) that for oral health care/cough-cold combinations, the indicationsstated in the cough-cold monograph should be used. 32. Two comments requested that the Panel's recommended combinations ofactive ingredients identified in andSection; 356.20 be expanded to includethe following combinations in appropriate dosage forms: (1) Any anesthetic/analgesicactive ingredient identified in andSection; 356.10 may be combined with anyinternal analgesic active ingredient identified in andSection; 343.10 and(2) any anesthetic/analgesic active ingredient identified in andSection;356.10 may be combined with any demulcent active ingredient identifiedin andSection; 356.16 and with any internal analgesic active ingredient identifiedin andSection; 343.10.The comments stated that these are rational combinations because thereare several different mechanisms of action that provide relief of sorethroat pain. The comments explained that topical anesthetic/analgesic ingredientsand demulcent ingredients would provide prompt pain relief, and internalanalgesic ingredients would prolong the relief of pain for several hours.The agency believes that the combinations listed above may be rational.However, the agency is not aware of any currently marketed OTC drug productthat contain these combinations, and the comments provided no data to demonstratethe safety and effectiveness of any such combination. In this tentativefinal monograph, the agency is therefore proposing to classify the followingcombinations in Category III: (1) any anesthetic/analgesic combined withany internal analgesic and (2) any anesthetic/analgesic combined with anydemulcent and any internal analgesic. The agency invites public commenton these combinations.33. One comment noted that under andSection; 356.20(a) of the Oral CavityPanel's recommended monograph two debriding agents could be considereda Category I combination. The comment further noted, however, that thecombination of two oral wound cleansers (which are the same ingredientsand are used for the same purposes as debriding agents) is a Category IIcombination in the advance notice of proposed rulemaking for OTC oral mucosalinjury drug products (44 FR 63276).The comment supported a Category I classification for the combination oftwo active ingredients from the same therapeutic drug category when eachactive ingredient makes a contribution to the claimed effect, the safetyor effectiveness of any active ingredient is not decreased, and the combinationhas some advantage over the single active ingredient. The comment requestedthat the monograph for oral mucosal injury drug products be corrected toallow the combination of two oral wound cleansers.The agency is not proposing all of the Panel's recommended combinationsin andSection; 356.20(a) as Category I combinations. (See comment 30 above.)Rather, based upon the agency's general guidelines for OTC drug combinationproducts (Ref. 1) and as stated in andSection; 330.10, the agency is proposingCategory III classification for combinations containing two or more ingredientsfrom the same pharmacotherapeutic group with the same mechanism of actionunless data show that the combination offers some advantage over the activeingredients used alone, and that the combination is, on a benefit-riskbasis, equal to or better than each of the active ingredients used aloneat its therapeutic dose. Also, as noted in comment 19 above, the agencyis combining that part of the rulemaking for OTC oral mucosal injury drugproducts that includes oral wound cleansers with the rulemaking for OTCoral health care drug products and is creating a new class of drugs calleddebriding agent/oral wound cleanser drug products. The agency concludesthat there is no basis for classifying the combination of two or more debridingagent/oral wound cleanser ingredients in Category I and is proposing toclassify that combination in Category III in this tentative final monographto allow for further comments and the submission of data to support sucha combination.Therefore, if the data are submitted that justify the combination of twoor more debriding agent/oral wound cleansers, that combination will bereclassified from Category III to Category I in the final monograph.<ITAG tagnum="72">Reference</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Food and Drug Administration, ``General Guidelines for OTC DrugCombination Products,'' September 1978, Docket No. 78D-0322, Dockets ManagementBranch.</ITAG>34. One comment recommended that FDA reinstate the acceptability of a combinationof debriding agents and demulcent agents, which was recognized in the Panel'sdrafts on combinations. As an example, the comment noted that in one productsubmitted to the Panel a demulcent recognized by the Panel (glycerin) isalso the vehicle providing a stable dosage form of a debriding agent (carbamideperoxide).The Panel's published report, rather than its working drafts, representsits final conclusions and recommendations to FDA. The combination of adebriding agent with a demulcent was not specifically discussed in thePanel's report, nor did the Panel classify as Category I any combinationcontaining a debriding agent. In fact, the Panel classified several combinationscontaining debriding agents in Category II. It concluded that a debridingagent, because of its mechanical cleansing action, would wash away or dilutethe other active ingredients in the combination and thus prevent them fromacting as intended or from exerting their therapeutic effects (47 FR 22792.)The agency agrees with the Panel.Regarding the comment's specific example, carbamide peroxide in anhydrousglycerin, the agency concludes that anhydrous glycerin is a pharmaceuticalnecessity used for the sole purpose of stabilizing the carbamide peroxideand as such is not considered to be an active ingredient in this product.Such products would contain only one active ingredient (carbamide peroxide)and would not be considered a combination of a debriding agent and a demulcent.For the reasons above, the agency is proposing that combinations of debridingagent/oral wound cleansers and demulcents be classified Category II.<ITAG tagnum="85">II. The Agency's Tentative Adoption of the Panel's Report</ITAG>A.Summary of Ingredient Categories and Testing of Category II and CategoryIII Conditions1. <T3>Summary of ingredient categories. </T3>The agency has reviewed allclaimed active ingredients submitted to the Oral Cavity Panel and oralwound cleanser ingredients submitted to the Dental Panel as well as otherdata and information available at this time, and has made the followingchanges in the categorization of oral health care (anesthetic/analgesic,astringent, debriding agent/oral wound cleanser, decongestant, demulcent,and expectorant) active ingredients recommended by the Panels. The agencyis combining debriding agents reviewed by the Oral Cavity Panel and oralwound cleansers reviewed by the Dental Panel into one therapeutic group,debriding agent/oral wound cleansers. The agency is proposing to reclassifysodium perborate monohydrate, 1.2 g, used as a debriding agent/oral woundcleanser, from Category II to Category I. The agency is proposing to reclassifyaspirin in a chewing gum base, used as a topical anesthetic/analgesic,from Category I to Category III for effectiveness. Aspirin in a chewinggum base remains in Category I for safety when used as a topical anesthetic/analgesic.In addition, the agency is not including decongestant or expectorant ingredientsin this rulemaking but is transfering them to the rulemaking for OTC cough-colddrug products. As a convenience to the reader, the following list is includedas a summary of the categorization of oral health care (anesthetic/analgesic,astringent, debriding agent/oral wound cleanser, decongestant, demulcent,and expectorant) active ingredients proposed by the Panel and the agency.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,p8,8/9,i1,s25,xls24,xs24</C> <H1>Oral health care active ingredients</H1><H1>Panel</H1><H1>FDA</H1>Oral health care anesthetic/analgesics:<ITAG tagnum="3">Antipyrine</ITAG><D>II</D><D>II</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Aspirin</ITAG><D>I</D><D>III</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Benzocaine</ITAG><D>I</D><D>I</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Benzyl alcohol</ITAG><D>I</D><D>I</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Camphor</ITAG><D>II</D><D>II</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Cresol</ITAG><D>II</D><D>II</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Dibucaine</ITAG><D>II</D><D>II</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Dibucaine hydrochloride</ITAG><D>II</D><D>II</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Dyclonine hydrochloride</ITAG><D>I</D><D>I</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Eucalyptol (eucalyptus oil)</ITAG><D>III</D><D>III</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Hexylresorcinol</ITAG><D>I</D><D>I</D><ITAG tagnum="3">LIdocaine</ITAG><D>II</D><D>II</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Lidocaine hydrochloride</ITAG><D>II</D><D>II</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Menthol</ITAG><D>I</D><D>I</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Methyl salicylate</ITAG><D>III</D><D>III</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Phenol preparations (phenol and/or phenolate sodium)</ITAG><D>I</D><D>I</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Pyrilamine maleate</ITAG><D>II</D><D>II</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Salicyl alcohol</ITAG><D>I</D><D>I</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Tetracaine</ITAG><D>II</D><D>II</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Tetracaine hydrochloride</ITAG><D>II</D><D>II</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Thymol</ITAG><D>III</D><D>III</D>Oral health care astringents:<ITAG tagnum="3">Alum</ITAG><D>I</D><D>I</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Myrrh Tincture</ITAG><D>II</D><D>II</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Zinc chloride</ITAG><D>I</D><D>I</D>Oral health care debriding agent/oral wound cleanser:<ITAG tagnum="3">Carbamide peroxide in anhydrous glycerin</ITAG><D>I</D><D>I</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Hydrogen peroxide</ITAG><D>I</D><D>I</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Sodium bicarbonate</ITAG><D>I</D><D>I</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Sodium perborate monohydrate</ITAG><D>II</D><D>I</D>Oral health care decongestants:<ITAG tagnum="3">Phenylephrine hydrochloride</ITAG><D>III</D><D>R\1\</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Phenylpropanolamine hydrochloride</ITAG><D>III</D><D>R\1\</D>Oral health care demulcents:<ITAG tagnum="3">Elm bark</ITAG><D>I</D><D>I</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Gelatin</ITAG><D>I</D><D>I</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Glycerin</ITAG><D>I</D><D>I</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Pectin</ITAG><D>I</D><D>I</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Sugars (sucrose, dextrose, fructose, and dextrins)</ITAG><D>(\2\)</D><D>III</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Sorbitol</ITAG><D>(\2\)</D><D>III</D>Oral health care expectorants:<ITAG tagnum="3">Ammonium chloride</ITAG><D>III</D><D>R\1\</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Horehound</ITAG><D>III</D><D>R\1\</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Potassium iodide</ITAG><D>II</D><D>R\1\</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Tolu balsam</ITAG><D>III</D><D>R\1\</D><F>\1\ R_Referred to the rulemaking for OTC cough-cold drug products.</F><F>\2\ Not reviewed.</F></ITAG>2. <T3>Testing of Category II and Category III conditions</T3>. The Oral CavityPanel recommended testing guidelines for OTC oral health care drug products(47 FR 22781 to 22784) and testing guidelines for OTC oral health careanesthetic/analgesic drug products (47 FR 22830 to 22831). The Dental Panelrecommended testing guidelines for OTC oral mucosal injury drug products(44 FR 63287 to 63289). The agency is offering these guidelines as thePanel's recommendations without adopting them or making any formal commenton them. Interested persons may communicate with the agency about the submissionsof data and information to demonstrate the safety or effectiveness of anyOTC oral health care anesthetic/analgesic, astringent, debriding agent/oralwound cleanser, or demulcent active ingredient or condition included inthe review by following the procedures outlined in the agency's policystatement published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of September 29, 1981 (46 FR 47740). This policystatement includes procedures for the submissions and review of proposedprotocols, agency meetings with industry or other interested persons, andagency communications on submitted test data and other information.B. Summary of the Agency's ChangesFDA has considered the comments and other relevant information and concludesthat it will tentatively adopt the Panel's report and recommended monographwith the changes described in FDA's responses to the comments above andwith other changes described in the summary below. A summary of the changesmade by the agency follows.1. Because of the overlap and similarities in the definitions, therapeuticuse, mechanisms of action, and site of action of oral wound cleansers anddebriding agents, the agency has decided to incorporate portions of therulemaking for OTC oral mucosal injury drug products into this tentativefinal monograph for OTC oral health care drug products. The agency is combiningthe definition of oral wound cleansers proposed in andSection; 353.3 of thetentative final monograph for OTC oral mucosal injury drug products andthe definition of a debriding agent recommended by the Oral Cavity Panelin andSection; 356.3(e) and is proposing the combined definition for debridingagent/oral wound cleansers in andSection; 356.3 of this tentative final monograph.The agency is also reproposing, with minor modification, the indications,warnings, and directions from andSection; 353.50 and the professional labelingfrom andSection; 353.80 of the tentative final monograph for OTC oral mucosalinjury drug products in andSection; 356.70 and andSection; 356.80 respectivelyof this tentative final monograph. (See comments 19 and 25 above.)The agency is deferring consideration of recommended andSection; 353.20(b),regarding the combination of an oral wound cleanser and an antiseptic,to the antimicrobial segment of the rulemaking for OTC oral health caredrug products.The agency addressed oral wound healing agents in a final rule publishedin the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of July 18, 1986 (51 FR 26112). (See comment19 above.)2. The agency is transferring decongestant and expectorant ingredientsto the rulemaking for OTC cough-cold drug products. Therefore, the agencyis not including andSection;andSection; 356.3(f) and (h), 356.15, 356.17, 356.20(d),(g), and (j), 356.55, and 356.57 of the advance notice of proposed rulemakingin this tentative final monograph. The agency will discuss decongestantswithin the context of the rulemaking for OTC nasal decongestant drug productsthat will be published in a future issue of the <T4>Federal Register. </T4>The agency will discuss expectorants in thefinal monograph for OTC expectorant drug products that will be publishedin a future issue of the <T4>Federal Register. </T4>(See comments 28 and 31 above.)3. In this tentative final monograph, the agency is deleting the words``health care'' from the statements of identity in andSection;andSection; 356.55(a),356.65(a), 356.70(a), and 356.75(a). The agency believes that the word``oral'' is the key word in the statements of identity for oral healthcare drug products and that the words ``health care'' are excessive andunnecessary.4. The agency is classifying aspirin (in a chewing gum base) in CategoryIII for effectiveness and in Category I for safety. Therefore, the agencyis not including the Panel's recommended andSection;andSection; 356.10(a) and356.50(a)(1), (c)(2), and (d)(1) in this tentative final monograph. (Seecomment 15 above.)5. The agency agrees with the Oral Cavity Panel's recommendation that systemicrelief of minor sore throat pain should be addressed in the rulemakingfor OTC internal analgesic, antipyretic, and antirheumatic drug productsand is transferring all comments and associated submissions regarding internalanalgesic ingredients for the relief of minor sore throat pain to thatrulemaking (Docket No. 77N-0094) for further evaluation. (See comment 14above.)6. The agency is revising the descriptions of carbamide peroxide in thePanel's recommended andSection;andSection; 356.14(a) and 356.54(d)(1) and isproposing, in this tentative final monograph, that andSection; 356.16(a)read as follows, ``Carbamide peroxide in anhydrous glycerin.'' Referenceto a solution of carbamide peroxide in water is not being included in thedirections proposed in andSection; 356.70(d)(1). (See comment 24 above.)7. Phenol identified in recommended andSection; 356.10(g) and phenolate sodiumidentified in recommended andSection; 356.10(h) are being replaced by ``Phenolpreparations (phenol and/or phenolate)'' in proposed andSection; 356.10(f)of this tentative final monograph. (See comment 9 above.)8. The agency is reclassifying sodium perborate monohydrate from CategoryII to Category I based upon the agency's evaluation of sodium perboratemonohydrate as an oral wound cleanser and is including sodium perboratemonohydrate, 1.2 g to be dissolved in 30 mL water in andSection; 356.16(d)as a debriding agent/oral wound cleanser. The agency is including directionsfor use of sodium perborate monohydrate as a debriding agent/oral woundcleanser in andSection; 356.70(d)(4) of this tentative final monograph. (Seecomment 22 above.)9. The agency is classifying concentrations of less than 2 mg menthol ina solid dosage form for use as an anesthetic/analgesic active ingredientin Category III. (See comment 12 above.)10. The agency is classifying sugars and sorbital in solid and nonsoliddosage forms for use as a demulcent in Category III. (See comment 29 above.)11. The agency is inviting the submission of data in support of a minimumdosage of 5 mg benzyl alcohol per solid dosage form. (See comment 13 above.)12. The agency is not accepting the Panel's Category I recommendation forthe combinations it included in andSection; 356.20(a) and is instead proposinga Category III classification for those combinations that contain two ormore ingredients from the same pharmacological group except in specificcases where data have shown a Category I classification is appropriate.As a result, the agency is classifying combinations containing two or moreingredients from the following pharmacological groups in Category III:anesthetic/analgesics in andSection; 356.10, astringents in andSection; 356.14,debriding agent/oral wound cleansers in andSection; 356.16, and demulcentsin andSection; 356.18. (See comments 30 and 33 above.)13. The agency is proposing to classify the following combinations in CategoryI: benzocaine and phenol or menthol. (See comment 30 above.)14. In this tentative final monograph, the agency is classifying the followingcombinations in Category III: menthol and benzyl alcohol, phenol, or salicylalcohol; an anesthetic/analgesic and an internal analgesic; and an anesthetic/analgesic,an internal analgesic, and a demulcent. (See comments 30 and 32 above.)15. The agency is proposing a Category II classification for the combinationof a debriding agent/oral wound cleanser and demulcent. (See comment 34above.) 16. Because combinations of cough-cold active ingredients with oral healthcare active ingredients are primarily cough-cold products, they are notbeing discussed in this document but will be addressed in the tentativefinal monograph for OTC cold, cough, allergy, bronchodilator, and antiasthmaticcombination drug products to be published in a future issue of the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. Therefore, andSection; 356.20 (d), (g), and (j)of the Panel's recommended monograph are not being proposed in this tentativefinal monograph. The agency is instead proposing andSection; 356.20(g) whichrefers to andSection; 341.40 for oral health care and cough-cold combinationsand to andSection; 356.78(b)(1) which states that for oral health care/cough-coldcombinations, the indications stated in the cough-cold monograph shouldbe used. (See comment 31 above.)17. To encompass the variety of different solid dosage forms (lozenges,compressed tablets) and nonsolid dosage forms (mouthwashes, gels) thatmay be used as OTC oral health care drug products, the agency is usingthe terms ``solid dosage forms'' and ``dosage forms other than solid,''and is not using specific dosage form terms such as rinse, mouthwash, lozenge,etc., in andSection;andSection; 356.55(d), 356.65(d), 356.70(d), and 356.75(d)of the tentative final monograph except where the identification of a specificdosage form is relevant to the use, safety, or effectiveness of the ingredient.(See comment 11 above.)18. The warning recommended by the Panel in andSection;andSection; 356.50(c)(3),356.52(c)(2), 356.54(c)(2), and 356.56(c)(2) is not being included in thistentative final monograph. Instead, the agency is proposing the phrase``and then spit out'' in appropriate places in the directions in andSection;andSection;356.55(d), 356.65(d), 356.70(d), and 356.75(d) of this tentative finalmonograph. (See comment 3 above.)19. The agency is proposing that the lower age limit for use of all OTCoral health care drug products included in this tentative final monographby 2 years, except for sodium perborate monohydrate and except for phenolpreparations that are intended for ingestion or that could be inadvertentlyingested. (See comment 22 above and Change No. 22 below.) In addition,in order to be consistent with labeling proposed for debriding agent/oralwound cleansers, the agency is deleting any reference to age limits fromthe warnings proposed for the OTC oral health care products included inthis tentative final monograph and is, instead, including age requirementsin the directions for use in andSection;andSection; 356.55(d), 356.65(d), 356.70(d),and 356.75(d). (See comment 26 above.)20. The agency believes that children under 12 years of age should be supervisedin the use of OTC oral health care nonsolid dosage forms. This restrictionwas recommended by the Dental Panel in the advance notice of proposed rulemakingfor OTC oral mucosal injury drug products (44 FR 63278), and the agencyagrees with that Panel. Therefore, in this tentative final monograph fororal health care drug products, the agency is proposing the phrase ``Childrenunder 12 years of age should be supervised in the use of the product''in all directions for use of dosage forms other than solid. 21. The agency believes the oral health care drug products in a dosageform other than solid should be gargled, swished around the mouth (affectedarea), or allowed to stay in place for at least 1 minute in order to exerttheir effect in the oral cavity, except for phenol which has been shownto exert its effect or the oral cavity in 15 seconds. (See Change No. 22below.) Therefore, the agency is proposing such wording in the directionsin andSection;andSection; 356.55(d), 356.65(d), 356.70(d), and 356.75(d). Theword ``gargle'' is not included in andSection; 356.70(d) because debridingagent/oral wound cleansers are not indicated for the relief or sore throatsymptoms. (See comment 26 above.)22. The warnings recommended by the Panel in andSection;andSection; 56.50(c)(1)(i) and (ii), 356.52(c)(1) (i) and (ii), and 356.56(c)(1) (i) and (ii)are not being included in this tentative final monograph. In order to limitthe number of warnings and to simplify labeling so that only essentialinformation is required, the agency is proposing to combine those warnings.Additionally, because OTC oral health care drug products other than debridingagent/oral wound cleansers may be used to relieve conditions associatedwith either sore throat or sore mouth, the agency believes that, in additionto the 2-day warning statement associated with sore throat symptoms, anotherstatement would be useful to reflect the less serious nature of sore mouthsymptoms. (For discussion of sore mouth symptoms, see comment 26 above.)Therefore, the agency is proposing the following revised warning in andSection;andSection;356.55(c)(1), 356.65(c), and 356.75(c) of this tentative final monograph:``If sore throat is severe, persists for more than 2 days, is accompaniedor followed by fever, headache, rash, nausea, or vomiting, consult a doctorpromptly. If sore mouth symptoms do not improve in 7 days, see your dentistor doctor promptly.'' The agency is proposing in andSection; 356.55(c)(2)a slightly different warning for anesthetic/analgesic drug products labeledonly ``for temporary relief of pain associated with canker sores.'' [Thesection numbers recommended by the Panel have been redesignated in thistentative final monograph.] 23. In this tentative final monograph the agency is including the followingindication for OTC oral anesthetic/analgesic active ingredients in andSection;356.50(b): ``For temporary relief of pain associated with canker sores.''(See comment 6 above.) 24. Instead of the Panel's recommended directions for use of phenol andphenolate sodium in andSection; 356.50(d) (7) and (8), the agency is revisingthose directions and including them in proposed andSection; 356.55(d)(6)of this tentative final monograph. The agency believes that although phenol-containingoral health care drug products for local application (such as a spray orlocally applied gel) may be used in children 2 years of age and older,phenol-containing oral health care products that are intended for ingestion(solid dosage forms) or that could be inadvertently ingested (mouthwashes)should not be used in children under 6 years of age except under the supervisionof a dentist or doctor. Although the amount of drug products used for local application in theoral cavity is small (usually less than 1 mL), the amount of product usedas a mouthwash or oral rinse may be 10 to 25 mL. Children have been reportedto be more sensitive to phenol toxicity than adults (Ref. 1), and childrenare more likely to swallow a liquid drug product (44 FR 63278). The DentalPanel stated that, for children under 6 years of age, there was no recommendeddosage for phenol for use as a dental rinse except under the supervisionof a dentist or doctor (47 FR 22759). In addition, the labeling of currentlymarketed OTC oral health care drug products containing phenol restrictsuse of the product to adults and children over 6 years of age (Ref. 2).Therefore, the agency is proposing to restrict the use of phenol-containinglozenges (solid dosage form) and the use of nonsolid dosage forms (suchas oral rinses or mouthwashes) to children 6 years of age and older. However,phenol-containing nonsolid dosage forms intended for local application(such as sprays or locally applied gels) may be used by children 2 yearsof age and older. Moreover, the agency is proposing to restrict the amountof phenol-containing oral rinse or mouthwash that children 6 to 12 yearsof age may use to 10 mL per application so that the maximum pediatric dosageof 300 mg per day is not exceeded. The agency does not believe that itis necessary to restrict the amount of liquid dosage form used by adults.(See comment 10 above.) Furthermore, the agency believes that the anesthetic effectiveness of phenoldepends not only upon the dosing frequency but also upon the contact timeper dose. Therefore, the agency is proposing at least a 15-second contacttime for each application of a phenol-containing dosage form other thansolid (Refs. 2 and 3). (For additional discussion of rinse times, see comment10 above.) The agency is proposing the following directions for OTC oralhealth care anesthetic/analgesic drug products containing phenol and/orphenolate sodium in andSection;356.55(d)(6) of this tentative final monograph:<ITAG tagnum="21">(i) <T3>For dosage forms other than solid, the product is an aqueous solutionor suspension containing phenol or phenolate sodium equivalent to 0.5-to 1.5-percent phenol</T3>_(<T3>a</T3>) <T3>For direct application. </T3>Adults and children 2 years of age andolder: Apply to the affected area, allow to remain in place for at least15 seconds and then spit out. Use every 2 hours or as directed by a dentistor doctor. Children under 12 years of age should be supervised in the useof this product. Children under 2 years of age: Consult a dentist or doctor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(<T3>b</T3>) <T3>For use as a mouthwash (oral rinse). </T3>Adults and children 12 yearsof age and older: Gargle or swish around the mouth for at least 15 secondsand then spit out. Use every 2 hours or as directed by a dentist or doctor.Children 6 to under 12 years of age: Apply 10 milliliters to the affectedarea, gargle or swish around the mouth for at least 15 seconds and thenspit out. Use every 2 hours or as directed by a dentist or doctor. Childrenunder 12 years of age should be supervised in the use of this product.Children under 6 years of age: Consult a dentist or doctor. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) <T3>For solid dosage forms, the product (lozenge or tablet) contains phenolor phenolate sodium equivalent to 10 to 50 milligrams phenol. </T3>Adultsand children 12 years of age and older: Allow the product (lozenge or tablet)to dissolve slowly in the mouth. May be repeated every 2 hours or as directedby a dentist or doctor. Children 6 to under 12 years of age: Allow productlozenge or tablet to dissolve slowly in the mouth. May be repeated every2 hours, not to exceed 300 milligrams phenol in 24 hours, or as directedby a dentist or doctor. Children under 6 years of age: Consult a dentistor doctor. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">References </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Solis-Cohen, S., and T. S. Githens, ``Pharmacotherapeutics,''in ``Materia Medica and Drug Action,'' D. Appleton and Co., New York, p.750, 1928. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) OTC Volume 13 ATFM. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Bronsky, D. A., ``To Evaluate the Efficacy of Both ChlorasepticSolution and Chloraseptic Lozenges When Used to Relieve the Gingival andBuccal Mucosal Discomfort Associated with Orthodontic Braces,'' draft ofunpublished study, C00014, Docket No. 80N-0033, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG>25. Because debriding agent/oral wound cleansers have not historicallybeen indicated for use in the relief of sore throat symptoms, and becausethe therapeutic benefits of using these ingredients for sore throat symptomsare not apparent, the agency is proposing that debriding agent/oral woundcleansers be limited to use only in relieving symptoms associated withsore mouth. (See comment 26 above.) The agency is proposing the followingindications for debriding agent/oral would cleansers in andSection;356.70(b)of this tentative final monograph: (1) ``Aids in the removal of phlegm, mucus, or other secretions associatedwith occasional sore mouth.'' (2) ``For temporary use in cleansing minor wounds or minor gum inflammationresulting from minor dental procedures, dentures, orthodontic appliances,accidental injury, or other irritations of the mouth and gums.'' (3) ``For temporary use to cleanse canker sores.'' 26. The agency is proposing that debriding agent/oral wound cleansers canbe safely used for up to 7 days before seeking professional guidance becausedebriding agent/oral wound cleansers are indicated only for removal offoreign material associated with sore mouth, and sore mouth symptoms areunlikely to be indicative of serious health threats. In addition, the agencyis proposing that the lower age limit for use of debriding agent/oral woundcleansers, except sodium perborate monohydrate (see comment 22 above),be 2 years of age, and that because the age limitations are included inthe directions, they need not be included in a warning statement. Because debriding agent/oral wound cleansers are not indicated for sorethroat symptoms, the agency is not including in this tentative final monographthe warning statement recommended by the Panel in andSection;356.54(c)(1)(i).Instead, the agency is combining the warning recommended in andSection;353.50(c)of the tentative final monograph for OTC oral mucosal injury drug productswith the Panel's recommended warning in andSection;356.54(c)(1)(ii), to readas follows: ``Do not use this product for more than 7 days unless directedby a dentist or doctor. If sore mouth symptoms do not improve in 7 days;if irritation, pain, or redness persists or worsen; or if swelling, rash,or fever develops, see your dentist or doctor promptly'' and is includingthis warning in andSection;356.70(c) of this tentative final monograph. (Seecomment 26 above.) 27. The agency is not accepting the directions for use for carbamide peroxideand hydrogen peroxide recommended by the Panel in andSection;356.54(d) (1)and (2). Instead, the directions recommended by the agency for carbamideperoxide and hydrogen peroxide as oral wound cleansers in andSection;353.50(d)(1) and (2) of the tentative final monograph for OTC oral mucosal injurydrug products, with minor modifications, are being proposed in andSection;356.70(d)(1) and (2) of this tentative final monograph. (See comment 27 above.)28. The agency is proposing the following additional indications for anesthetic/analgesicingredients identified in andSection; 356.10 in andSection; 356.80 <T3>Professional labeling </T3>in this tentative final monograph: ``Forthe temporary relief of pain associated with any one or more of the followingconditions; tonsilitis, pharyngitis, throat infections, and stomatitis.''(See comment 5 above.) 29. As a result of incorporating portions of the rulemaking for OTC oralmucosal injury drug products into this tentative final monograph, the agencyis adding a section, andSection; 356.70(b)(4), to the debriding agent/oralwound cleanser section of this tentative final monograph entitled ``Otherallowable statements'' to include the following statements that were proposedin the tentative final monograph for OTC oral mucosal injury drug products:``Assists in the removal of foreign material from minor oral wounds'' and``Physically removes debris from minor oral wounds.'' 30. Combining the oral health care rulemaking (proposed Part 356) and theoral mucosal injury rulemaking (proposed Part 353) into the present tentativefinal monograph under proposed 21 CFR Part 356 (entitled ``Oral HealthCare Drug Products for OTC Human Use'') and deferring decongestant andexpectorant active ingredients and cough-cold/oral health care combinationdrug products to other rulemakings has resulted in the redesignation ofmany section and paragraph numbers. The agency is also designating proposedSubpart D of the monograph as Subpart C and is placing the labeling sectionsunder Subpart C. 31. In an effort to simplify OTC drug labeling, the agency proposed ina number of tentative final monographs to substitute the word ``doctor''for ``physician'' in OTC drug monographs on the basis that the word ``doctor''is more commonly used and better understood by consumers. Based on commentsreceived to these proposals, the agency has determined that final monographsand other applicable OTC drug regulations will give manufacturers the optionof using either the word ``physician'' or the word ``doctor.'' This tentativefinal monograph proposes that option. The agency is proposing to remove the existing warning and caution statementsrequired by andSection; 369.20 for ``sodium perborate (sodium perborate monohydrate)mouthwash and gargle and toothpaste'' and for ``throat preparations fortemporary relief of minor sore throat: lozenges, troches, washes, gargles,etc.'' and the suggested warning for over-the-counter drugs for minor sorethroats in andSection; 201.315 because the conditions in those sections willbe superseded by the requirements of the final monographs on OTC oral healthcare drug products (Part 356, Subpart C) and OTC relief of oral discomfortdrug products (Part 354, Subpart C). The agency has examined the economic consequences of this proposed rulemakingin conjunction with other rules resulting from the OTC drug review. Ina notice published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of February 8, 1983 (48 FR 5806), the agencyannounced the availability of an assessment of these economic impacts.The assessment determined that the combined impacts of all the rules resultingfrom the OTC drug review do not constitute a major rule according to thecriteria established by Executive Order 12291. The agency therefore concludesthat no one of these rules, including this proposed rule for OTC oral healthcare anesthetic/analgesic, astringent, debriding agent/oral wound cleanser,and demulcent drug products, is a major rule. The economic assessment also concluded that the overall OTC drug reviewwas not likely to have a significant economic impact on a substantial numberof small entities as defined in the Regulatory Flexibility Act, PublicLaw 96-354. That assessment included a discretionary Regulatory FlexibilityAnalysis in the event that an individual rule might impose an unusual ordisproportionate impact on small entities. However, this particular rulemakingfor OTC oral health care anesthetic/analgesic astringent, debriding agent/oralwound cleanser, and demulcent drug products is not expected to pose suchan impact on small businesses. Therefore, the agency certifies that thisproposed rule, if implemented, will not have a significant economic impacton a substantial number of small entities. The agency invited public comment in the advance notice of proposed rulemakingregarding any impact that this rulemaking would have on OTC oral healthcare anesthetic/analgesic, astringent, debriding agent, and demulcent drugproducts. It also invited public comment in the tentative final monographfor OTC oral mucosal injury drug products regarding any impact that thisrulemaking would have an OTC oral mucosal injury drug products. No commentson economic impacts were received in response to either request. Any commentson the agency's initial determination of the economic consequences of thisproposed rulemaking should be submitted by May 26, 1988. The agency willevaluate any comments and supporting data that are received and will reassessthe economic impact of this rulemaking in the preamble to the final rule.The agency has carefully considered the potential environmental effectsof this action and has concluded that the action will not have a significantimpact on the human environment and that an environmental impact statementis not required. The agency's finding of no significant impact and theevidence supporting that finding, contained in an environmental assessment,may be seen in the Dockets Management Branch (address above) between 9a.m. and 4 p.m., Monday through Friday. This action was considered underFDA's final rule implementing the National Environmental Policy Act (21CFR Part 25).Interested persons may, on or before May 26, 1988, submit to the DocketsManagement Branch (HFA-305), Food and Drug Administration, Room 4-62, 5600Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD 20857, written comments, objections, or requestsfor oral hearing before the Commissioner on the proposed regulation. Arequest for an oral hearing must specify points to be covered and timerequested. Written comments on the agency's economic impact determinationmay be submitted on or before May 26, 1988. Three copies of all comments,objections, and requests are to be submitted, except that individuals maysubmit one copy. Comments, objections, and requests are to be identifiedwith the docket number found in brackets in the heading of this documentand may be accompanied by a supporting memorandum or brief. Comments, objections,and requests may be seen in the office above between 9 a.m. and 4 p.m.,Monday through Friday. Any scheduled oral hearing will be announced inthe <T4>Federal Register</T4>.Interested persons, on or before January 27, 1989, may also submit in writingnew data demonstrating the safety and effectiveness of those conditionsnot classified in Category I. Written comments on the new data may be submittedon or before March 27, 1989. These dates are consistent with the time periodsspecified in the agency's final rule revising the procedural regulationsfor reviewing and classifying OTC drugs, published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of September 29, 1981 (46 FR 47730). Three copiesof all data and comments on the data are to be submitted, except that individualsmay submit one copy, and all data and comments are to be identified withthe docket number found in brackets in the heading of this document. Dataand comments should be addressed to the Dockets Management Branch (HFA-305)(address above). Received data and comments may also be seen in the officeabove between 9 a.m. and 4 p.m., Monday through Friday.In establishing a final monograph, the agency will ordinarily consideronly data submitted prior to the closing of the administrative record onMarch 27, 1989. Data submitted after the closing of the administrativerecord will be reviewed by the agency only after a final monograph is publishedin the <T4>Federal Register</T4>, unless the Commissioner finds good cause hasbeen shown that warrants earlier consideration.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects</ITAG>21 CFR Part 201Drugs, Labeling.21 CFR Part 356Labeling, Over-the-counter drugs, Oral health care drug products.21 CFR Part 369OTC drugs, Warning and caution statements.Therefore, under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act and the AdministrativeProcedure Act, it is proposed that Subchapter D of Chapter I of Title 21of the Code of Federal Regulations be amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 201_LABELING</ITAG>1. The authority citation for 21 CFR Part 201 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 201(p), 502, 505, 701, 52 Stat. 1041-1042 asamended, 1050-1053 as amended, 1055-1056 as amended by 70 Stat. 919 and72 Stat. 948 (21 U.S.C. 321(p), 352, 355, 371); 5 U.S.C. 553; 21 CFR 5.10and 5.11.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 201.315</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>2. Subpart G is amended by removing andSection; 201.315 <T3>Over-the-counter drugs for minor sore throats; suggested warning.</T3>3. By adding new Part 356, to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 356_ORAL HEALTH CARE DRUG PRODUCTS FOR OVER-THE-COUNTER HUMANUSE</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General Provisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">356.1 Scope.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">356.3 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Active Ingredients</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">356.10 Anesthetic/analgesics.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">356.14 Astringents.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">356.16 Debriding agent/oral wound cleansers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">356.18 Demulcents.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">356.20 Permitted combinations of active ingredients.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_Labeling</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">356.50 Labeling of oral health care drug products.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">356.55 Labeling of anesthetic/analgesic drug products.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">356.65 Labeling of astringent drug products.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">356.70 Labeling of debriding agent/oral wound cleanser drug products.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">356.75 Labeling of demulcent drug products.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">356.78 Labeling of combination drug products.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">356.80 Professional labeling.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 201(p), 502, 505, 701, 52 Stat. 1041-1042 asamended, 1050-1053 as amended, 1055-1056 as amended by 70 Stat. 919 and72 Stat. 948 (21 U.S.C. 321(p), 352, 355, 371); 5 U.S.C. 553; 21 CFR 5.10and 5.11.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General Provisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 356.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope.</ITAG>(a) An over-the-counter oral health care drug product in a form suitablefor topical administration is generally recognized as safe and effectiveand is not misbranded if it meets each condition in this part and eachgeneral condition established in andSection; 330.1(b) References in this part to regulatory sections of the Code of FederalRegulations are to Chapter I of Title 21 unless otherwise noted.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 356.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>As used in this part:(a) <T3>Oral health care drug. </T3>A drug product applied topically for theproper care of the oral cavity, including the temporary relief of symptomsof the mouth and throat, for example, occasional minor sore throat or mouthsoreness.(b) <T3>Anesthetic/analgesic.</T3> A substance applied topically to an epithelialsurface (e.g., skin or mucous membrane) that relieves pain without necessarilyabolishing other sensations (analgesic) or a substance applied topicallythat completely blocks pain receptors resulting in a sensation of numbnessand abolition of response to painful stimuli (anesthetic).(c) <T3>Anhydrous glycerin.</T3> An ingredient that may be prepared by heatingglycerin U.S.P. at 150 anddegrees;C for 2 hours to drive off the moisturecontent.(d) <T3>Astringent.</T3> An agent that causes contraction of the tissues orarrest of secretions by coagulation of proteins on a cell surface.(e) <T3>Debriding agent/oral wound cleanser.</T3> A nonirritating agent whichcauses or assists in the removal (physically or chemically) of foreignmaterial or devitalized or contaminated tissue from or adjacent to a minororal wound or a traumatic or infected lesion to expose surrounding healthytissue and does not delay wound healing.(f) <T3>Demulcent.</T3> A bland, inert agent that soothes and relieves irritationof inflamed or abraded surfaces such as mucous membranes.(g) <T3>Mouthwash (oral rinse).</T3> A solution used for rinsing the mouth,not necessarily for medicinal purposes.(h) <T3>Oral cavity (mouth).</T3> The cavity of the mouth and associated structures,including the cheeks, palate, oral mucosa, glands where ducts open intoit, the teeth, and the tongue.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Active Ingredients</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 356.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Anesthetic/analgesics.</ITAG>The active ingredient of the product consists of any of the following whenused within the dosage limits and in the dosage form established for eachingredient in andSection; 356.55(d).(a) Benzocaine.(b) Benzyl alcohol.(c) Dyclonine hydrochloride.(d) Hexylresorcinol.(e) Menthol.(f) Phenol preparations (phenol and/or phenolate sodium).(g) Salicyl alcohol.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 356.14</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Astringents.</ITAG>The active ingredient of the product consists of any of the following whenused within the dosage limits and in the dosage form established for eachingredient in andSection; 356.65(d).(a) Alum.(b) Zinc chloride.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 356.16 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Debriding agent/oral wound cleansers.</ITAG>The active ingredient of the product consists of any of the following whenused within the dosage limits and in the dosage form established for eachingredient in andSection; 356.70(d).(a) Carbamide peroxide in anhydrous glycerin.(b) Hydrogen peroxide.(c) Sodium bicarbonate.(d) Sodium perborate monohydrate.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 356.18 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Demulcents.</ITAG>The active ingredient of the product consists of any of the following whenused within the dosage limits and in the dosage form established for eachingredient in andSection; 356.75(d):(a) Elm bark.(b) Gelatin.(c) Glycerin.(d) Pectin.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 356.20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Permitted combinations of active ingredients.</ITAG>(a) Any anesthetic/analgesic active ingredient identified in andSection;356.10 may be combined with any astringent active ingredient identifiedin andSection; 356.14.(b) Any anesthetic/analgesic active ingredient identified in andSection;356.10 may be combined with any demulcent active ingredient identifiedin andSection; 356.18.(c) Benzocaine identified in andSection; 356.10(a) may be combined with mentholidentified in andSection; 356.10(e).(d) Benzocaine identified in andSection; 356.10(a) may be combined with phenolpreparations identified in andSection; 356.10(f).(e) Oral health care and cough-cold combinations. See andSection; 341.40.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_Labeling</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 356.50 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Labeling of oral health care drug products.</ITAG>(a) The word physician may be substituted for the word doctor in any ofthe labeling statements in this part.(b) Where applicable, indications in this part applicable to each ingredientin the product may be combined to eliminate duplicative words or phrasesso that the resulting information is clear and understandable. Other truthfuland nonmisleading statements, describing only the indications for use thathave been established and listed in this part, may also be used, as providedin andSection; 330.1(c)(2), subject to the provisions of section 502 of theact relating to misbranding and the prohibition in section 301(d) of theact against the introduction or delivery for introduction into interstatecommerce of unapproved new drugs in violation of section 505(a) of theact.(c) Warnings and directions for use, respectively, applicable to each ingredientin the product may be combined to eliminate duplicative words or phrasesso that the resulting information is clear and understandable.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 356.55 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Labeling of anesthetic/analgesic drug products.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Statement of identity.</T3> The labeling of the product contains theestablished name of the drug, if any, and identifies the product as an``oral anesthetic,'' an ``oral anesthetic/analgesic,'' or an ``oral painreliever.''(b) <T3>Indications.</T3> The labeling of the product states, under the heading``Indications,'' either or both of the following:(1) ``For temporary relief of occasional minor irritation, pain, sore mouth,and sore throat.''(2) ``For temporary relief of pain associated with canker sores.''(c) <T3>Warnings.</T3> The labeling of the product contains the following warningsunder the heading ``Warnings'':(1) <T3>For all products containing any ingredient identified in andSection;356.10.</T3> ``If sore throat is severe, persists for more than 2 days,is accompanied or followed by fever, headache, rash, nausea, or vomiting,consult a doctor promptly. If sore mouth symptoms do not improve in 7 days,see your dentist or doctor promptly.''(2) <T3>For all products containing any ingredient identified in andSection;356.10labeled with only the indication in andSection;356.55(b)(2).</T3> ``Do notuse this product for more than 7 days unless directed by a dentist or doctor.If sore mouth symptoms do not improve in 7 days; if irritation, pain, orredness persists or worsens; or if swelling, rash or fever develops, seeyour dentist or doctor promptly.''(d) <T3>Directions.</T3> The labeling of the product contains the followinginformation under the heading ``Directions'':(1) <T3>For products containing benzocaine identified in andSection;356.10(a)</T3>_(i)<T3>For dosage forms other than solid, the product is a 5- to 20-percentsolution or suspension.</T3> Adults and children 2 years of age and older:Apply to the affected area. Gargle, swish around in the mouth, or allowto remain in place at least 1 minute and then spit out. Use up to 4 timesdaily or as directed by a dentist or doctor. Children under 12 years ofage should be supervised in the use of the product. Children under 2 yearsof age: Consult a dentist or doctor.(ii) <T3>For solid dosage forms, the product contains 2 to 15 milligrams benzocaine.</T3>Adults and children 2 years of age and older: Allow product to dissolveslowly in the mouth. May be repeated every 2 hours as needed or as directedby a dentist or doctor. Children under 2 years of age: Consult a dentistor doctor.(2) <T3>For products containing benzyl alcohol identified in andSection;356.10(b)</T3>_(i)<T3>For dosage forms other than solid, the product is a 0.05- to 10-percentsolution or suspension.</T3> Adults and children 2 years of age and older:Apply to the affected area. Gargle, swish around, or allow to remain inplace at least 1 minute and then spit out. Use up to 4 times daily or asdirected by a dentist or doctor. Children under 12 years of age shouldbe supervised in the use of the product. Children under 2 years of age:Consult a dentist or doctor.(ii) <T3>For solid dosage forms, the product contains 100 to 500 milligramsbenzyl alcohol.</T3> Adults and children 2 years of age and older: Allowproduct to dissolve slowly in the mouth. May be repeated every 2 hoursas needed or as directed by a dentist or doctor. Children under 2 yearsof age: Consult a dentist or doctor.(3) <T3>For products containing dyclonine hydrochloride identified in </T3>andSection;<T3>356.10(c)</T3>_(i) <T3>For dosage forms other than solid, the product is a 0.05- to 0.10-percentsolution or suspension.</T3> Adults and children 2 years of age and older:Apply to the affected area. Gargle, swish around, or allow to remain inplace at least 1 minute and then spit out. Use up to 4 times daily or asdirected by a dentist or doctor. Children under 12 years of age shouldbe supervised in the use of this product. Children under 2 years of age:Consult a dentist or doctor.(ii) <T3>For solid dosage forms, the product contains 1 to 3 milligrams dycloninehydrochloride. </T3>Adults and children 2 years of age and older: Allowproduct to dissolve slowly in the mouth. May be repeated every 2 hoursas needed or as directed by a dentist or doctor. Children under 2 yearsof age: Consult a dentist or doctor.(4) <T3>For products containing hexylresorcinol identified in andSection;356.10(d)</T3>_(i)<T3>For dosage forms other than solid, the product is a 0.05- to 0.1-percentsolution or suspension.</T3> Adults and children 2 years of age and older:Apply to the affected area. Gargle, swish around, or allow to remain inplace at least 1 minute and then spit out. Use up to 4 times daily or asdirected by a dentist or doctor. Children under 12 years of age shouldbe supervised in the use of the product. Children under 2 years of age:Consult a dentist or doctor.(ii) <T3>For solid dosage forms, the product contains 2 to 4 milligrams hexylresorcinol.</T3>Adults and children 2 years of age and older: Allow product to dissolveslowly in the mouth. May be repeated every 2 hours as needed or as directedby a dentist or doctor. Children under 2 years of age: Consult a dentistor doctor.(5) <T3>For products containing menthol identified in </T3>andSection;<T3>356.10(e)</T3>_(i) <T3>For dosage forms other than solid, the product is a 0.04- to 2-percentsolution or suspension.</T3> Adults and children 2 years of age and older:Apply to the affected area. Gargle, swish around, or allow to remain inplace at least 1 minute and then spit out. Use up to 4 times daily or asdirected by a dentist or doctor. Children under 12 years of age shouldbe supervised in the use of this product. Children under 2 years of age:Consult a dentist or doctor.(ii) <T3>For solid dosage forms, the product contains 2 to 20 milligrams menthol.</T3>Adults and children 2 years of age and older: Allow product to dissolveslowly in the mouth. May be repeated every 2 hours as needed or as directedby a dentist or doctor. Children under 2 years of age: Consult a dentistor doctor.(6) <T3>For products containing phenol preparations identified in </T3>andSection;<T3>356.10(f)</T3>_(i) <T3>For dosage forms other than solid, the product is an aqueous solutionor suspension containing phenol or phenolate sodium equivalent to 0.5-to 1.5-percent phenol</T3>_(A)<T3> For direct application. </T3> Adults and children 2 years of age andolder: Apply to the affected area. Gargle, swish around, or allow to remainin place at least 15 seconds and then spit out. Use every 2 hours or asdirected by a dentist or doctor. Children under 12 years of age shouldbe supervised in the use of this product. Children under 2 years of age:Consult a dentist or doctor.(B)<T3> For use as a mouthwash (oral rinse).</T3> Adults and children 12 yearsof age and older: Apply to the affected area. Gargle, swish around themouth for at least 15 seconds and then spit out. Use every 2 hours or asdirected by a dentist or doctor. Children 6 to under 12 years of age: Apply10 milliliters to the affected area, gargle, or swish around the mouthfor at least 15 seconds and then spit out. Use every 2 hours or as directedby a dentist or doctor. Children under 12 years of age should be supervisedin the use of this product. Children under 6 years of age: Consult a dentistor doctor.(ii) <T3>For solid dosage forms, the product (lozenge or tablet) contains phenolor phenolate sodium equivalent to 10 to 50 milligrams phenol.</T3> Adultsand children 12 years of age and older: Allow the product (lozenge or tablet)to dissolve slowly in the mouth. May be repeated every 2 hours or as directedby a dentist or doctor. Children 6 to under 12 years of age: Allow product(lozenge or tablet) to dissolve slowly in the mouth. May be repeated every2 hours, not to exceed 300 milligrams phenol in 24 hours, or as directedby a dentist or doctor. Children under 6 years of age: Consult a dentistor doctor.(7) <T3>For products containing salicyl alcohol identified in andSection;356.10(g)</T3>_(i)<T3> For dosage forms other than solid, the product is a 1- to 6-percentsolution or suspension.</T3> Adults and children 2 years of age and older:Apply to the affected area. Gargle, swish around, or allow to remain inplace at least 1 minute and then spit out. Use up to 4 times daily or asdirected by a dentist or doctor. Children under 12 years of age shouldbe supervised in the use of this product. Children under 2 years of age:Consult a dentist or doctor.(ii) <T3>For solid dosage forms, the product contains 50 to 100 milligrams salicylalcohol.</T3> Adults and children 2 years of age or older: Allow productto dissolve slowly in the mouth. May be repeated every 2 hours as neededor as directed by a dentist or doctor. Children under 2 years of age: Consulta dentist or doctor.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;356.65</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Labeling of astringent drug products.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Statement of identify.</T3> The labeling of the product contains theestablished name of the drug, if any, and identifies the product as an``oral astringent.''(b) <T3>Indications.</T3> The labeling of the product states, under the heading``Indications,'' the following: ``For temporary relief of occasional minorirritation, pain, sore mouth, and sore throat.''(c) <T3>Warnings.</T3> The labeling of the product contains the following warningsunder the heading ``Warnings'':(1) <T3>For all products containing any ingredient identified in </T3>andSection;<T3>356.14.</T3> ``If sore throat is severe, persists for more than 2 days,is accompanied or followed by fever, headache, rash, nausea, or vomiting,consult a doctor promptly. If sore mouth symptoms do not improve in 7 days,see your dentist or doctor promptly.''(d) <T3>Directions. </T3>The labeling of the product contains the followinginformation under the heading ``Directions'': (1) <T3>For products containing alum identified in andSection;356.14(a), theproduct is a 0.2- to 0.5-percent aqueous solution. </T3>Adults and children2 years of age and older: Apply to the affected area. Gargle, swish around,or allow to remain in place at least 1 minute and then spit out. Use upto 4 times daily or as directed by a dentist or doctor. Children under12 years of age should be supervised in the use of this product. Childrenunder 2 years of age: Consult a dentist or doctor. (2) <T3>For products containing zinc chloride identified in andSection;356.14(b),the product is a 0.1- to 0.25-percent aqueous solution. </T3>Adults andchildren 2 years of age and older: Apply to the affected area. Gargle,swish around, or allow to remain in place at least 1 minute and then spitout. Use up to 4 times daily or as directed by a dentist or doctor. Childrenunder 12 years of age should be supervised in the use of this product.Children under 2 years of age: Consult a dentist or doctor. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;356.70 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Labeling of debriding agent/oral wound cleanser drug products. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Statement of identity. </T3>The labeling of the product contains theestablished name of the drug, if any, and identifies the product as an``oral debriding agent'' or an ``oral debriding agent/oral wound cleanser.''(b) <T3>Indications. </T3>The labeling of the product states, under the heading``Indications,'' either or all of the following: (1) ``Aids in the removal of phlegm, mucus, or other secretions associatedwith occasional sore mouth.'' (2) ``For temporary use in cleansing minor wounds or minor gum inflammationresulting from minor dental procedures, dentures, orthodontic appliances,accidental injury, or other irritations of the mouth and gums.'' (3) ``For temporary use to cleanse canker sores.'' (4) <T3>Other allowable statements. </T3>In addition to the required informationspecified in paragraphs (a), (b), (c), and (d) of this section, the labelingof the product may contain any of the following statements, provided suchstatements are neither placed in direct conjunction with information requiredto appear in the labeling nor occupy labeling space with greater prominenceor conspicuousness than the required information. (i) ``Assists in the removal of foreign material from minor oral wounds.''(ii) ``Physically removes debris from minor oral wounds.'' (c) <T3>Warnings. </T3>The labeling of the product contains the following warningsunder the heading ``Warnings'': (1) <T3>For all products containing any ingredient identified in andSection;356.16.</T3>``Do not use this product for more than 7 days unless directed bya dentist or doctor. If sore mouth symptoms do not improve in 7 days; ifirritation, pain, or redness persists or worsens; or if swelling, rash,or fever develops, see your dentist or doctor promptly.'' (d) <T3>Directions. </T3>The labeling of the products contains the followinginformation under the heading ``Directions'': (1) <T3>For products containing carbamide peroxide identified in andSection;356.16(a),the product is a 10- to 15-percent solution in anhydrous glycerin_(i) </T3><T3>For direct application. </T3>Adults and children 2 years of age andolder: Apply several drops directly to the affected area of the mouth.Allow the medication to remain in place at least 1 minute and then spitout. Use up to 4 times daily after meals and at bedtime or as directedby a dentist or doctor. Children under 12 years of age should be supervisedin the use of this product. Children under 2 years of age: Consult a dentistor doctor. (ii) <T3>For use as a mouthwash (oral rinse). </T3>Adults and children 2 yearsof age and older: Place 10 to 20 drops onto tongue. Mix with saliva. Swisharound in the mouth over the affected area for at least 1 minute and thenspit out. Use up to 4 times daily after meals and at bedtime or as directedby a dentist or doctor. Children under 12 years of age should be supervisedin the use of this product. Children under 2 years of age: Consult a dentistor doctor.(2)<T3> For products containing hydrogen peroxide identified in andSection;356.16(b), the product is a 3-percent aqueous solution</T3>_(i)<T3> For direct application.</T3> Adults and children 2 years of age andolder: Apply several drops to the affected area of the mouth. Allow themedication to remain in place at least 1 minute and then spit out. Useup to 4 times daily after meals and at bedtime or as directed by a dentistor doctor. Children under 12 years of age should be supervised in the useof this product. Children under 2 years of age: Consult a dentist or doctor.(ii)<T3> For use as an oral rinse.</T3> Adults and children 2 years of ageand older: Mix with an equal amount of warm water. Swish around in themouth over the affected area for at least 1 minute and then spit out. Useup to 4 times daily after meals and at bedtime or as directed by a dentistor doctor. Children under 12 years of age should be supervised in the useof the product. Children under 2 years of age: Consult a dentist or doctor.(3)<T3> For products containing sodium bicarbonate identified in andSection;356.16(c).</T3> Adults and children 2 years of age and older: Prepare asolution by mixing \1/2\ to 1 teaspoon in \1/2\ glass (4 ounces) of water.Swish around in mouth over affected area for at least 1 minute and thenspit out. Use up to 4 times daily or as directed by a dentist or doctor.Children under 12 should be supervised in the use of the product. Childrenunder 2 years of age: Consult a dentist or doctor. (4)<T3> For products containing sodium perborate monohydrate identified inandSection; 356.16(d).</T3> Adults and children 6 years of age and older:Dissolve 1.2 grams of sodium perborate monohydrate in 1 ounce (30 milliliters)of warm water. Use immediately. Swish solution around in the mouth overthe affected area or gargle for at least 1 minute and then spit it out.Do not swallow. Use up to 4 times daily after meals and at bedtime or asdirected by a dentist or doctor. Children under 12 years of age shouldbe supervised in the use of this product. Consult a dentist or doctor foruse in children under 6 years of age. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 356.75</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Labeling of demulcent drug products. </ITAG>(a)<T3> Statement of identity.</T3> The labeling of the product contains theestablished name of the drug, if any, and identifies the product as an``oral demulcent.'' (b)<T3> Indications.</T3> The labeling of the product states, under the heading``Indications,'' the following: ``For temporary relief of minor discomfortand protection of irritated areas in sore mouth and sore throat.'' (c)<T3> Warnings.</T3> The labeling of the product contains the followingwarnings under the heading ``Warnings'': (1)<T3> For all products containing any ingredient identified in andSection;356.18.</T3> ``If sore throat is severe, persists for more than 2 days,is accompanied or followed by fewer, headache, rash, nausea, or vomiting,consult a doctor promptly. If sore mouth symptoms do not improve in 7 days,see your dentist or doctor promptly.'' (2)<T3> For products containing glycerin identified in andSection; 356.18(c).</T3>``Do not use full strength. Dilute with two or three volumes of water.''(d)<T3> Directions.</T3> The labeling of the product contains the followinginformation under the heading ``Directions'': (1)<T3> For products containing elm bark identified in andSection; 356.18(a),the product is 10- to 15-percent elm bark in a solid dosage form.</T3>Adult and children 2 years of age and older: Allow product to dissolveslowly in the mouth. May be repeated every 2 hours as needed or as directedby a dentist or doctor. Children under 2 years of age: Consult a dentistor doctor. (2)<T3> For products containing gelatin identified in andSection; 356.18(b)</T3>_(i)<T3> For dosage forms other than solid, the product is a 5- to 10-percentsolution or suspension containing a sufficient quantity of gelatin to forma semi-solid state.</T3> Adults and children 2 years of age and older:Apply to the affected area. Gargle, swish around in the mouth, or allowto remain in place for at least 1 minute and then spit out. Use as neededor as directed by a dentist or doctor. Children under 12 years of age shouldbe supervised in the use of the product. Children under 2 years of age:Consult a dentist or doctor.(ii)<T3> For solid dosage forms, the product contains a sufficient quantityof gelatin to form a solid state.</T3> Adults and children 2 years of ageand older: Allow product to dissolve slowly in the mouth. May be repeatedas needed or as directed by a dentist or doctor. Children under 2 yearsof age: Consult a doctor. (3)<T3> For products containing glycerin identified in andSection; 356.18(c).</T3>Adults and children 2 years of age and older: Apply a solution containingglycerin diluted with 2 or 3 parts of water to the affected area. Gargle,swish around in the mouth, or allow to remain in place for at least 1 minuteand then spit out. Use as needed or as directed by a dentist or doctor.Children under 12 years of age should be supervised in the use of thisproduct. Children under 2 years of age: Consult a dentist or doctor. (4)<T3> For products containing pectin identified in andSection; 356.18(d)</T3>_(i)<T3> For dosage forms other than solid, the product is a solution or agel containing a sufficient quantity of pectin to form a semi-solid state.</T3>Adults and children 2 years of age and older: Apply to the affected area.Gargle, swish around in the mouth, or allow to remain in place for at least1 minute and then spit out. Use as needed or as directed by a dentist ordoctor. Children under 12 years of age should be supervised in the useof the product. Children under 2 years of age: Consult a dentist or doctor.(ii)<T3> For solid dosage forms, the product contains a sufficient quantityof pectin to form a solid state.</T3> Adults and children 2 years of ageand older: Allow product to dissolve slowly in the mouth. May be repeatedas needed or as directed by a dentist or doctor. Children under 2 yearsof age: Consult a dentist or doctor. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 356.78</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Labeling of combination drug products. </ITAG>Statements of identity, indications, warnings, and directions for use,respectively, applicable to each active ingredient in the combination drugproduct may be combined to eliminate duplicative words or phrases so thatthe resulting information is clear and understandable. (a)<T3> Statement of identity.</T3> For a combination drug product that hasan established name, the labeling of the product states the establishedname of the combination drug product, followed by the statement of identityfor each ingredient in the combination, as established in the statementof identity sections of the applicable OTC drug monographs. For a combinationdrug product that does not have an established name, the labeling of theproduct states the statement of identity for each ingredient in the combination,as established in the statement of identity sections of the applicableOTC drug monographs, unless otherwise stated below.(b)<T3> Indications.</T3> The labeling of the product states, under the heading``Indications,'' the indication(s) for each ingredient in the combination,as established in the indications sections of the applicable OTC drug monographs,unless otherwise stated below. Other truthful and nonmisleading statements,describing only the indications for use that have been established in theapplicable OTC drug monographs or listed below may also be used as providedin andSection; 330.1(c)(2), subject to the provisions of section 502 of theact relating to misbranding and the prohibition in section 301(d) of theact against the introduction or delivery for introduction into interstatecommerce of unapproved new drugs in violation of section 505(a) of theact. In addition to the required information identified above in this section,the labeling of the combination drug product may contain any of the ``otherallowable statements'' (if any) that are identified in the applicable monographs,provided such statements are neither placed in direct conjunction withinformation required to appear in the labeling nor occupy labeling spacewith greater prominence or conspicuousness than the required information.(1)<T3> For permitted combinations identified in andSection; 356.20(e).</T3>The indications in andSection; 341.85 should be used. (To be published ina future issue of the<T4> Federal Register</T4>.) (c)<T3> Warnings.</T3> The labeling of the product states, under the heading``Warnings,'' the warning(s) for each ingredient in the combination, asestablished in the warnings sections of the applicable OTC drug monographs,unless otherwise stated below. (d)<T3> Directions.</T3> The labeling of the product states, under the heading``Directions,'' directions that conform to the directions established foreach ingredient in the directions sections of the applicable OTC drug monographs,unless otherwise stated below. When the time intervals or age limitationsfor administration of the individual ingredients differ, the directionsfor the combination product may not exceed any maximum dosage limits establishedfor the individual ingredients in the applicable OTC drug monograph. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 356.80</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Professional labeling. </ITAG>(a) The labeling of products containing oral anesthetic/analgesic activeingredients identified in andSection; 356.10 provided to health professionals(but not to the general public) may contain the following indication: ``Forthe temporary relief of pain associated with'' (select one or more of thefollowing conditions: ``tonsilitis,'' ``pharyngitis,'' ``throat infections,''or ``stomatitis.'') (b) The labeling of products containing oral debriding agent/oral woundcleanser active ingredients identified in andSection; 356.16 provided tohealth professionals (but not to the general public) may contain the followingindication: ``For temporary use in the cleansing of gum irritation dueto erupting teeth (teething).'' <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 369_INTERPRETATIVE STATEMENTS RE WARNINGS ON DRUGS AND DEVICESFOR OVER-THE-COUNTER SALE </ITAG>4. The authority citation for 21 CFR Part 369 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 502, 503, 506, 507, 701, 52 Stat. 1050-1052 asamended, 55 Stat. 851, 59 Stat. 463 as amended, 52 Stat. 1055-1056 as amended(21 U.S.C. 352, 353, 356, 357, 371); 21 CFR 5.10 and 5.11. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 369.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>5. In subpart B, andSection; 369.20<T3> Drugs; recommended warning and caution statements</T3> is amendedby removing the entries for ``SODIUM PERBORATE MOUTHWASH AND GARGLE ANDTOOTHPASTE'' and ``THROAT PREPARATIONS FOR TEMPORARY RELIEF OF MINOR SORETHROAT: LOZENGES, TROCHES, WASHES, GARGLES, ETC.''<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: October 5, 1987. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Frank E. Young, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Commissioner of Food and Drugs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-1455 Filed 1-26-88; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4160-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>